Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 116.112 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Board of Elections shall establish a voter registration purge program using the change-of-address
information supplied by the United States Postal Service through its licensees or other sources to identify
voters whose addresses may have changed. The State Board of Elections is authorized to enter into agreements
with other governmental agencies to further voter list maintenance practices. Intergovernmental agreements
for the exchanging of any data shall be permitted if the[ sole] purpose of exchanging data is to remove
ineligible voters. The data shall not be subject to any commercial use, directly or indirectly, or third-party
access to the voter registration system.
(2) (a) If it appears from information provided by the postal service or other sources that a voter has moved to
a different address in the same county in which the voter is currently registered, the State Board of
Elections shall provide to the county board of elections the information necessary to change the
registration records to show the new address and the State Board of Elections shall send to the new
address a notice of the change by forwardable mail on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections
and a postage prepaid, pre-addressed return form by which the voter may verify or correct the address
information.
(b) If the county board of elections requests authorization from the State Board of Elections to send address
confirmation notices as provided in this subsection, the State Board of Elections shall grant the request.
(3) (a) If it appears from information provided by the postal service or other sources that a voter has moved to
a different address not in the same county, the State Board of Elections shall send to the address from
which the voter was last registered, by forwardable mail, a notice on a form prescribed by the State
Board of Elections, with a postage prepaid and pre-addressed return card on which the voter may state
his or her current address.
(b) If a county board of elections requests authorization from the state board to send address confirmation
notices as provided in this subsection, the state board shall grant the request.
(4) The state or county boards of elections shall not remove the name of a voter from the registration records on
the ground that the voter has changed his or her residence unless the voter:
(a) Confirms in writing, or on a form provided by the State Board of Elections on its official website, that
the voter has changed residence to a place outside the county; or
(b) 1. Has failed to respond to the notice described in subsection (3) of this section; and
2. Has not voted or appeared to vote and, if necessary, correct the registration records of the voter's
address in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day
after the date of the second general election for federal office that occurs after the date of the
notice.
If a county board of elections requests authorization from the state board to conduct purges of voters in its
county in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, the state board shall grant the request.
(5) The State Board of Elections shall establish an inactive list of all voters who fail to respond to the notice
described in subsection (3) of this section and do not vote or appear to vote in an election during the period
beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election for
federal office that occurs after the date of the notice. If a county board of elections requests authorization from
the state board to establish an inactive list of voters for its county, the state board shall grant the request.
(6) The State Board of Elections shall complete, not later than ninety (90) days prior to the date of a primary or
regular election, any program the purpose of which is to systematically remove the names of ineligible voters
from the registration records.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) Voters placed on an inactive list are to be counted only for purposes of voting and not for purposes of
establishing or modifying precincts, calculating the amount of reimbursement of county clerks by the State
Board of Elections for certain election-related expenses, or reporting official statistics, except as provided by
the Election Assistance Commission's regulations promulgated pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act
of 1993.
(8) (a) The State Board of Elections and county boards of elections shall maintain for at least two (2) years and
shall make available for public inspection and, where available, photocopying at a reasonable cost, all
records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of ensuring
the accuracy and currency of the registration records, except to the extent that the records relate to the
declination to register to vote or the identity of a voter registration agency through which any particular
voter is registered.
(b) The records maintained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include lists of the names and
addresses of all persons to whom notices described in subsection (3) are sent, and information
concerning whether each person has responded to the notice as of the date that inspection of the records
is made.
Section 2. KRS 116.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) On or before January 1, 2011, each city clerk, except in consolidated local governments and urban-
county governments, shall provide the clerk of the county or counties in which the city is located with a
list of all properties within the city and a map of the city boundaries for the county clerk to maintain a
roster of voters who are eligible to vote in city elections. A county clerk may accept the list of city
properties in an electronic format and the city clerk may provide a copy of the city's boundary map
maintained by the Kentucky Commonwealth Office of Technology, Division of Geographic
Information Systems; and
(b) Documentation of any change to the boundaries of a city shall be reported to the county clerk in
accordance with KRS 81A.475.
(2) (a) On or before January 1, 2011, each school district board shall provide the clerk of the county in which
the school district is located with maps and written descriptions of the boundaries of each school board
district located in the county for the county clerk to maintain a roster of voters who are eligible to vote
in school board elections.
(b) Documentation of any change to a school district's boundaries shall be reported to the county clerk
within sixty (60) days of the change, or immediately if the change is within sixty (60) days of the
June[August] 1 deadline established in KRS 160.210(4)(d).
(3) Each county clerk shall code all registered voters in that county in such a manner that precinct election officers
may determine the voter's eligibility to vote in city and school board elections prior to each primary and
regular election for city officers in that county, each regular election for school board members in that county,
and each special election in which a ballot question is presented to the residents of a city or a school board
district.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 64.012, the county clerk shall not charge a fee to a city or school district providing any
information required by subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county clerk from requesting additional information from the city,
school district board, or any other reliable source to ascertain whether a registered voter resides within a city or
a school district boundary.
Section 3. KRS 117.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] voting system or voting equipment shall be approved for use[ after January 1, 2024,] by the State Board
of Elections, either upon initial examination or reexamination, and[ no] voting equipment or a voting system
shall not be purchased[ after July 14, 2022,] unless the system and equipment has been certified under KRS
117.379 and is so constructed that it shall:
(a)[(1)] Ensure secrecy to the voter in the act of voting so that no person can see or know for whom any
other voter has voted or is voting, except for those voters requiring assistance under KRS 117.255;
(b)[(2)] Permit votes to be cast for any candidate entitled to have his or her name printed upon the ballots
at any primary, regular election, or special election, and for or against any public question entitled to be
placed upon the ballots;

CHAPTER 175 3
(c)[(3)] Except at a primary, permit a voter to vote for all the candidates of one (1) party or for one (1) or
more candidates of every party having candidates entitled to be voted for, or for one (1) or more
independent, political organization, or political group candidates;
(d)[(4)] Permit a voter to vote for as many persons for an office as the voter is lawfully entitled to vote
for, and no more;
(e)[(5)] Prevent a voter from voting for more persons for any office than the voter is entitled to vote for,
and from voting for the same person, or for or against the same question, more than once;
(f)[(6)] Permit a voter to vote for or against any question the voter may have the right to vote on, but no
other;
(g)[(7)] Provide for a nonpartisan ballot;
(h)[(8)] Be capable of being adjusted for use in a primary so that a voter may not vote for any person
except those seeking nomination as candidates of the voter's party, as candidates for a nonpartisan
office, or as candidates for an office of the Court of Justice;
(i)[(9)] Permit each voter to vote for all the candidates for presidential electors of any party by one (1)
operation;
(j)[(10)] Permit each voter to vote, in any regular or special election, for any person for whom the voter
desires to vote whose name does not appear upon the ballot by providing a method of write-in voting;
(k)[(11)] Be safe, efficient, and accurate in the conduct of elections, and correctly register and accurately
count all votes cast for each person, and for or against each public question;
(l) 1.[(12) (a)] Provide each voter an opportunity to verify votes recorded on the permanent paper
ballot, either visually or using assistive voting technology, by producing a voter-verified paper
audit trail;
2.[(b)] Provide each voter an opportunity to change votes or correct any error before the voter's ballot is
cast and counted; and
3.[(c)] Provide a voter who spoils his or her ballot another ballot as provided under this chapter;
(m)[(13)] Use an individual, discrete, permanent, paper ballot cast by the voter for tabulating purposes;
(n)[(14)] Preserve the paper ballot as an official record available for use in any audit or recount;
(o)[(15)] Be suitably designed for the purpose used, constructed of a durable material, and safely
transportable;
(p)[(16)] Be capable of determining whether the voting equipment has been unlocked and operated or
adjusted in any manner after once being locked;
(q)[(17)] Have a public counter with a register which is visible from the outside of the counter or device
that will show at all times during an election how many persons have voted;
(r)[(18)] Have a protective cumulative counter indicating the number of votes cast for each person, and
the votes cast for or against each public question which cannot be seen, reset, or tampered with without
unlocking a covering device by a key or other security apparatus that cannot unlock any other part of
the equipment, and which prevents changes to the cumulative counter once the system has been put into
operation on the day of any election;
(s)[(19)] Provide for the tabulating of votes at the precinct as required under KRS 117.275;
(t)[(20)] Provide locks or other security apparatus by which the operation of the voting equipment may be
locked before the time for opening the polls and after the time for closing the polls;
(u)[(21)] Permit a voter to readily learn the method of operating it, to expeditiously cast a vote for all
candidates and on all questions of the voter's choice, and when operated properly, register and record
correctly and accurately every vote cast;
(v)[(22)] Bear a number or other unique designation that will distinguish it from any other voting
equipment or voting system;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(w)[(23)] Produce a real-time audit log record for the voting system, and produce a paper record with a
manual audit capacity which shall be available as an official record for any recount conducted related to
any primary or election in which the system is used;
(x)[(24)] Be accessible for individuals with impairments, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind or
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation,
including privacy and independence, as for other voters;
(y)[(25)] Prohibit voting equipment that tabulates or aggregates votes used in official results from
connecting to any network, including the internet, or communicating with any device external to the
voting system;
(z) Prohibit voting equipment that utilizes nonhuman readable codes, including but not limited to
barcodes, QR codes, or other encrypted markings, to represent or tabulate a voter's choices;
(aa)[(26)] Meet or exceed a standard[the standards] for a voting system approved[established] by the
Election Assistance Commission[, as amended from time to time,] and[ those] approved under KRS
117.379; and
(ab)[(27)] Meet such other requirements as may be established by the State Board of Elections in
administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A to reflect changes
in technology to ensure the integrity and security of voting systems.
(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, continued use of a voting system and all
voting equipment that was approved for use by the State Board of Elections as of the effective date of this
section of this Act, and was utilized by a county before the effective date of this section of this Act, shall be
allowed until such time as a replacement voting system is acquired by the county.
Section 4. KRS 117.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At least forty-five (45) days before any special election, and at least fifty (50) days before any primary or
regular election, the county clerk of each county shall cause to be printed and ready for use ballots listing each
candidate who, and each question which, is entitled to be voted upon in such primary or election. The ballots
shall be printed on clear white paper or other material, in black ink, in plain, clear type clearly legible to a
person with normal vision, and shall include the necessary party designations. The quality of the paper and the
size of the ballots shall be established by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations
promulgated in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of paper absentee ballots, voter affirmations, and
election official affirmations. The ballots shall be consecutively numbered and the county board shall keep a
record, by number, of all absentee ballots used for any of the purposes listed in this subsection.
(3) Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of federal provisional ballots, which, except for the
candidates listed, shall have the same form as the absentee ballots. A federal provisional ballot shall indicate
that the ballot is a federal provisional ballot. The federal provisional ballot stubs shall be consecutively
numbered, and the county board of elections shall keep a record, by number, of all federal provisional ballots
used for votes cast by provisional voters in federal elections.
(4) Each county clerk shall have printed a sufficient number of paper ballots to be used for voting for any primary
or election. The methods of securing the integrity of the ballots from the time of certification of each candidate
and each question to be voted upon in any primary or election until the conclusion of the primary or election,
and the method of tracking all voted, unvoted, or spoiled ballots shall be established by the State Board of
Elections in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) On the day before any in-person voting shall occur[No later than the Friday preceding a special or regular
election], the county clerk shall equip the voting equipment with the necessary supplies for the purpose of
write-in votes. The county clerk shall also provide a pencil, pen, or ballot marking device for the voting
equipment for write-in purposes.
(6) If supplemental paper ballots have been approved as provided in KRS 118.215, the county clerk shall cause to
be printed a sufficient number of supplemental paper ballots for the registered voters of each precinct. The
supplemental paper ballots shall have stubs which are numbered consecutively.
Section 5. KRS 117.265 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 175 5
(1) A voter may, at any regular or special election, cast a write-in vote for any person qualified as provided in
subsection (2) or (3) of this section[,] whose name does not appear upon the ballot for any office[,] by writing
the name of his or her choice upon the appropriate ballot for the office being voted on as required by KRS
117.125. Any candidate who is defeated or disqualified in a partisan or nonpartisan primary shall be ineligible
as a candidate for the same office in the regular election, unless there is a vacancy pursuant to KRS
118.105(3). Any voter utilizing a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional in-person absentee ballot, or
a mail-in absentee ballot for a regular or special election may write in a vote for any eligible person whose
name does not appear upon the ballot[,] by writing the name of his or her choice under the office.
(2) Write-in votes shall be counted only for candidates for election to office who have filed a declaration of intent
to be a write-in candidate with the Secretary of State or county clerk, depending on the office being sought, on
or before the certification deadlines established in KRS 118.215(1)(a) to (c) and 118A.090(2) and not later
than the second Friday before the date of a special election. In the case of a special election administered under
KRS 118.730, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate shall be filed at least twenty-eight (28) days
before the day of the election. The declaration of intent shall be filed no earlier than the first Wednesday after
the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot, and no later
than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which papers may be filed. The
declaration of intent shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State.
(3) A person shall not be eligible as a write-in candidate:
(a) For more than one (1) office in a regular or special election; or
(b) If his or her name appears upon the ballot for any office, except that the candidate may file a notice of
withdrawal prior to filing an intent to be a write-in candidate for office when a vacancy in a different
office occurs because of:
1. Death;
2. Disqualification to hold the office sought;
3. Severe disabling condition which arose after the nomination; or
4. The nomination of an unopposed candidate.
(4) Persons who wish to run for President and Vice President shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in
candidate, along with a list of presidential electors pledged to those candidates, with the Secretary of State on
or before the certification deadlines established in KRS 118.215(1)(a) to (c) and 118A.090(2)[fourth Friday
in October preceding the date of the regular election for those offices]. The declaration of intent shall be filed
no earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the
office will appear on the ballot, and no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last
date on which papers may be filed. Write-in votes cast for the candidates whose names appear on the ballot
shall apply to the slate of pledged presidential electors, whose names shall not appear on the ballot.
(5) The county clerk shall provide to the precinct election officers certified lists of those persons who have filed
declarations of intent as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. These lists shall not be posted
anywhere, but a voter may request to see a copy of the list. Once the voter has reviewed the copy, it shall
immediately be returned to the precinct election officer. Only write-in votes cast for qualified candidates shall
be counted.
(6) Two (2) election officers of opposing parties shall upon the request of any voter instruct the voter on how to
cast a write-in vote.
Section 6. KRS 117.275 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At the count of the votes in any precinct, any candidate or slate of candidates and any representatives to
witness and check the count of the votes therein, who are authorized to be appointed as is provided in
subsection (8) of this section, shall be admitted and permitted to be present and witness the count.
(2) As soon as the polls are closed[,] and the last voter has voted, the judges at that time shall immediately lock
and seal the voting equipment so that the voting and counting mechanisms will be prevented from operating,
and they shall sign a certificate stating:
(a) That the voting equipment has been locked against voting and sealed;
(b) The number of voters, as shown on the public counters;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) The number registered on the protective or cumulative counter or device; and
(d) The number or other designation of the voting equipment.
The certificate, with any additional certificate previously prepared under KRS 117.035, shall be returned by
the judges of election to the officials authorized by law to receive it. The judges shall compare the number of
voters, as shown by the counter of the voting equipment, with the number of those who have voted as shown
by the protective or cumulative counter or device.
(3) Where voting equipment is used that prints the candidates' names along with the total votes received on a
return sheet or record for that equipment, the precinct election officers shall sign the return sheets or record for
the voting equipment, which shall be posted on the door of the precinct.
(4) If any officer shall decline to sign the return sheets, he or she shall state the reason in writing, and a copy
thereof, signed by the officer, shall be enclosed with the return sheets.
(5) Each of the return sheets, if applicable, and the record of the voting equipment shall be enclosed in an
envelope. One (1) copy of the return sheets, if applicable, one (1) copy of the record of the voting equipment,
and the write-in roll, if any write-in votes were cast in the precinct, shall be directed to the county board of
elections of the county in which the election is being held. One (1) copy of the return sheets or record of the
voting equipment shall be given to the county clerk of the county in which the election is being held and to
each of the local governing bodies of the two (2) dominant political parties, but a local governing body of a
dominant political party may decline a copy of the precinct election return by filing a written declination with
the county board of elections prior to the election, and upon this declination, a printed copy shall not be issued
to the political party so declining. The declination on file shall be effective for that election and any
subsequent elections until revoked by the local governing body of a dominant political party by filing a written
revocation with the county board of elections. The envelope shall have endorsed thereon a certificate of the
election officers, stating the number or unique designation of the voting equipment, the precinct where it has
been used, the number on the seal, and the number on the protective or cumulative counter or device at the
close of the polls.
(6) During the period established by KRS 117.355(2)[(3)], and following the tabulation of all votes cast in the
election, including absentee votes and write-in votes:
(a) The county board of elections shall mail, transmit via facsimile machine, hand-deliver, or submit by
electronic means a copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the tabulation sheets showing the
results from each precinct to the State Board of Elections. The copy of the precinct-by-precinct
summary of the tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct shall include the votes cast on
the day of an election and during absentee voting; and
(b) The county clerk shall mail or deliver the precinct signature rosters from each precinct and the in-
person absentee ballot signature roster to the State Board of Elections.
(7) For each voting location, as soon as possible after the completion of the count, the two (2) election officers
who are not of the same political affiliation shall return to the county board of elections the keys to the voting
equipment received and receipted for by them, and the county clerk, in each voting location, shall have the
voting equipment properly boxed or securely covered and removed to a proper and secure place of storage.
(8) In primaries, each candidate or group of candidates may designate to the county board of elections a
representative to witness and check the vote count. In regular elections, the governing authority of each
political party, each candidate for member of board of education, nonpartisan candidate, political group
candidate, political organization candidate, independent candidate, or independent ticket may designate a
representative to the county board of elections to witness and check the vote count. The county board of
elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to witness the vote count.
(9) For all federal provisional ballots, if applicable, and supplemental paper ballots if approved as provided in
KRS 118.215, after the polls are closed, the two (2) judges shall return to the county clerk's office the locked
federal provisional ballot receptacle and the supplemental paper ballot box, all ballot stubs, spoiled ballots, and
unvoted ballots at the same time as the tabulation of votes from the voting equipment is delivered. The county
clerk shall issue a receipt for the number of ballot stubs, unvoted ballots, spoiled ballots, and the ballot boxes
or ballot receptacle.
(10) The county board of elections, or its designee, shall count and tally the supplemental paper ballots that have
not been tabulated by automatic tabulating equipment at the precinct, either manually or with the use of
tabulating equipment that has been certified by the State Board of Elections for use for that purpose in the

CHAPTER 175 7
county clerk's office. The results of the vote tally shall be certified by the county board of elections to the
county clerk and to the Secretary of State.
(11) The county board of elections shall tabulate the valid federal provisional ballots. The results of the vote tally
shall be certified by the county board of elections to the county clerk and to the Secretary of State. The county
board of elections shall mail a copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the valid federal provisional ballot
tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct to the State Board of Elections.
(12) The county board of elections shall authorize the candidates, slates of candidates, or their representatives, and
representatives of the news media to be present during the counting of the supplemental and federal
provisional paper ballots.
(13) No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of ballots, or any partial results, to any person
except those persons, election officials, or entities authorized by law to receive it, until 6 p.m. prevailing time
on the day of a primary or an election.
(14) (a) Unofficial election results transmitted online to the county board of elections or the State Board of
Elections shall occur by means of a secure online connection after results are tallied on the tally
computer that has been certified in accordance with KRS 117.379 as part of a voting system as defined
in KRS 117.001.
(b) If an external device is used to upload election results for the subsequent transmission, the device shall
be used for that primary or election only and be of a type approved by the State Board of Elections as
part of a voting system under KRS 117.379. The upload of the election results shall occur in the
presence of two (2) members of the county board of elections who are of a different political affiliation.
(15) Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to specified elections shall be
retained for twenty-two (22) months, and the county clerk shall retain the voted federal provisional ballots,
voter affirmations, election official affirmations, and the supplemental paper ballots for twenty-two (22)
months and the unvoted federal provisional ballots, the voter affirmations, election official affirmations, and
the supplemental paper ballots for sixty (60) days after each election day, after which time they shall be
destroyed in a manner to render them unreadable by the county board of elections if no contest or recount
action has been filed.
Section 7. KRS 117.355 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within three (3) days after any primary or general election, the precinct election sheriff shall file a report with
the chair of the county board of elections and with the local grand jury. The report shall include any
irregularities observed and any recommendations for improving the election process.
(2) Within ten (10) days after any primary or general election, the county board of elections shall transmit the
information required by subsection (6) of Section 6 of this Act and shall file a report with the State Board of
Elections and the local grand jury. The report shall include any irregularities of which the county board has
knowledge and any recommendations for improving the election process. The report shall also include a
breakdown by precinct of the number of voters requiring assistance to vote and the reasons therefor; the
number of special ballots cast by category; and any other information required by the state board.
(3) [Within thirty (30) days after any primary or general election, the county board of elections shall transmit the
information required by KRS 117.275(3) to (6).
(4) ]The State Board of Elections shall issue administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to prescribe the
forms required by this section.
Section 8. KRS 117.379 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person or corporation owning, manufacturing, or selling any voting system or e-poll book
product[,] may request the State Board of Elections to examine the voting system or e-poll book
product. Before requesting an examination or reexamination, any person, persons, or corporation shall
pay to the State Treasurer a nonrefundable deposit of five hundred dollars ($500) and submit a test
report from an independent testing authority approved by the State Board of Elections.
(b) If the report concerns a voting system, the report shall demonstrate that the voting system meets a
previously established[all] Election Assistance Commission standard[standards]. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, if an[these] Election Assistance Commission standard
has[standards have] been amended less than thirty-six (36) months prior to the request for examination
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
under this subsection, the State Board of Elections may approve and certify a voting system that meets
the prior standard[standards] after determining:
1. The effect that such approval would have on the integrity and security of elections; and
2. The procedure and cost involved to bring the voting system into compliance with the amended
standard[standards].
(c) The State Board of Elections may, at any time, reexamine any voting system or e-poll book product
already approved. The State Board of Elections shall approve or disapprove any voting system or e-poll
book product within sixty (60) days after the date of its initial submission. Any or all costs associated
with the voting system or e-poll book product being examined or reexamined shall be paid to the State
Treasurer by the person or corporation once the approval or disapproval is complete.
(2) (a) Upon receipt of a request for examination or reexamination of a voting system or e-poll book product,
the State Board of Elections shall require that the[such] voting system or e-poll book product be
examined or reexamined by three (3) examiners. The State Board of Elections shall appoint one (1)
examiner who is an expert in computer science, voting systems, or e-poll book products, whichever is
applicable; one (1) person who is knowledgeable in election procedures, election security, and election
law in Kentucky; and one (1) person who is a present or former county clerk. The three (3) examiners
shall submit one (1) written report on each voting system or e-poll book product, examined or
reexamined, to the State Board of Elections. The members of the State Board of Elections shall also
examine or reexamine the voting system or e-poll book product.
(b) A voting system shall be approved and certified if the examiners' report states that the voting system
meets all the requirements of KRS 117.125 and applicable federal law, and the State Board of Elections
finds that the voting system meets all of the requirements of KRS 117.125 and applicable federal law.
(c) Beginning September 1, 2022, an e-poll book product shall be approved and certified if the examiners'
report and the State Board of Elections find that the e-poll book product meets the certification
requirements promulgated by the State Board of Elections in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS
Chapter 13A and applicable federal law.
(d) Each report and letter of approval pertaining to a voting system or an e-poll book product shall be filed
in the office of the State Board of Elections.
(3) Any voting system or e-poll book product not approved by the State Board of Elections shall not be used at
any primary, regular election, or special election.
(4) When a voting system or e-poll book product has been approved, any improvement or changes in the voting
system or e-poll book product shall render necessary the examination or approval of such voting system or
improvement.
(5) Neither the members of the State Board of Elections, nor any examiner appointed by the State Board of
Elections, nor any member of a county board of elections shall have any pecuniary interest in any voting
system or e-poll book product.
(6) Each examiner appointed by the State Board of Elections shall receive fair compensation to be established by
the State Board of Elections[.
(7) An e-poll book product approved under this section shall not be used in any primary, regular election, or
special election held before May 11, 2023].
Section 9. KRS 117.389 is amended to read as follows:
On any day after ballots have been certified by the Secretary of State as provided in KRS 118.215,[ and] petitions to
allow consolidation of precincts have been approved by the State Board of Elections as provided in KRS 117.066,
and any petitions authorized by KRS 242.030(4) are filed, but not less than five (5) days prior to the election day, the
county clerk shall have the automatic tabulating equipment tested in the manner prescribed by the State Board of
Elections.
Section 10. KRS 118.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) [A ]"Political party" means[is] an affiliation or organization of electors representing a political policy and
having a constituted authority for its government and regulation, and whose candidate received at least ten

CHAPTER 175 9
percent (10%)[twenty percent (20%)] of the total vote cast at the last preceding election at which presidential
electors were voted for;
(2) [The word ]"Election," used in reference to a state, district, county, or city election, includes the decisions of
questions submitted to the qualified voters as well as the choice of officers by them;
(3) [A ]"Ballot" or "official ballot" means the official presentation of offices and candidates to be voted for,
including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for determination, and shall include a voting
machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee ballot, a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional absentee
ballot, or a supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of the voters in any primary,
regular election, or special election by the Secretary of State or the county clerk;
(4) "Ballot box" means any box, bag, or other container that can be locked, sealed, or otherwise rendered tamper-
resistant, for receiving ballots;
(5) "Election officer" means any person tasked with election administration within this state, as context dictates
the defined role, including but not limited to the Secretary of State and his or her employees, members of the
State Board of Elections and staff, members of the county boards of election and staff, precinct election
officers, election officials, and poll workers;
(6) "Voting equipment" means any physical component of a voting system and includes voting machines where
voting machines are in operation;
(7) "Voting machine" or "machine" means a part of a voting system that consists of:
(a) A direct recording electronic voting machine that:
1. Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-operated
components that may be actuated by the voter;
2. Processes the data by means of a computer program;
3. Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory components; and
4. Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and on a
printed copy; or
(b) One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot marking
device and an electronic or automatic vote tabulating device;
(8) "Voting system" means:
(a) The total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment, including
the software, hardware, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support that
equipment, that is used to:
1. Define ballots;
2. Cast and count votes;
3. Report or display election results; and
4. Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and
(b) The practices and associated documentation used to:
1. Identify system components and versions of those components;
2. Test the system during its development and maintenance;
3. Maintain records of system errors and defects;
4. Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the
system; and
5. Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots;
(9) [The word ]"Resident," used in reference to a candidate in a state, district, county, or city election means[shall
mean] actual resident, without regard to the residence of the spouse of the candidate;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10) "Political organization" means a political group not constituting a political party within the meaning of
subsection (1) of this section but whose candidate received two percent (2%) or more of the vote of the state at
the last preceding election for presidential electors; and
(11) "Political group" means a political group not constituting a political party or a political organization within the
meaning of subsections (1) and (10) of this section.
Section 11. KRS 118.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 118.155, any person who is qualified under the provisions of KRS 116.055 to vote
in any primary for the candidates for nomination by the party at whose hands he or she seeks the nomination,
shall have his or her name printed on the official ballot of his or her party for an office to which he or she is
eligible in that primary, upon filing, with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, at the proper
time, a notification and declaration.
(2) The notification and declaration shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State[State Board of
Elections]. It shall be signed by the candidate and by not less than two (2) registered voters[,] who, at the time
of signing, are of the same party as the candidate and from the district or jurisdiction from which the candidate
seeks nomination. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to
the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will
appear on the ballot. The notification and declaration for a candidate shall include the following oath:
"For the purpose of having my name placed on the official primary election ballot as a candidate for
nomination by the ------ Party, I, ------ (name in full as desired on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.129), do
solemnly swear that my date of birth is ----- (month/day/year), that my residence address is ----- (street, route,
highway, city if applicable, county, state, and zip code), that my mailing address, if different, is ----- (post
office address), and that I am a registered ------ (party) voter; that I believe in the principles of the ------ Party,
and intend to support its principles and policies; that I meet all the statutory and constitutional qualifications
for the office which I am seeking; that if nominated as a candidate of such party at the ensuing election I will
accept the nomination and not withdraw for reasons other than those stated in KRS 118.105(3); that I will not
knowingly violate any election law or any law relating to corrupt and fraudulent practice in campaigns or
elections in this state, and if finally elected I will qualify for the office."
The declaration shall be subscribed and sworn to before an officer authorized to administer an oath by the
candidate and by the two (2) voters making the declaration and signing the candidate's petition for office.
(3) When the notice and declaration has been filed with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, and
certified according to KRS 118.165, the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, shall have the
candidate's name printed on the ballot according to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in KRS
118.185.
(4) Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the filing papers and shall not be printed on the
ballots as part of the candidate's name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be
acceptable as the candidate's name.
Section 12. KRS 118.129 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate, shall certify the exact spelling and form of the name
of the candidate to be printed on all ballots in accordance with the requirements listed in this section.
(2) A candidate's nickname which is found to be, in the discretion of the Secretary of State or the county clerk, as
appropriate, a title, rank, degree, job description, or spurious phrase shall be placed on the ballot only if it is
the candidate's bona fide nickname, generally used by acquaintances of the candidate in the county of
residence to refer to the candidate, and if the nickname is acknowledged, by affidavit, under oath, by five (5)
residents of the county in which the candidate resides, to be a bona fide nickname. The candidate shall also
acknowledge, by affidavit under oath, that this is his or her bona fide nickname and is not being used to gain
an advantage on the ballot.
(3) A nickname shall always appear set off in quotation marks and immediately before the last name. Periods shall
follow all abbreviations or initials. Additional qualifiers following the last name, such as "Jr" or "III" shall not
be separated from the last name by a comma and shall be followed by a period.
(4) The candidate's name shall always appear in the following form: first or given name, contraction of given
name, or initial; middle name or names or initials, if desired by the candidate; nickname if desired by the
candidate; and last or surname in full. All names shall be in substantially the following form: John Lincoln

CHAPTER 175 11
"Jack" Doe; or J. Lincoln "Jack" Doe; or J. L. "Jack" Doe Jr.; or any of the above combinations without the
intervening nickname.
(5) The total number of spaces, inclusive of letters, spaces, and punctuation, which may be utilized on the ballot
for a candidate's name and, if any, nickname, shall be twenty-five (25). Notwithstanding the listing of the
candidate's name on the filing papers, spaces, periods, quotation marks, and commas necessary for proper
punctuation shall be added by the Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate. No candidate's name
shall exceed twenty-five (25) spaces. The Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate, shall
determine the correct listing for any candidate whose name exceeds twenty-five (25) spaces to conform to this
requirement.
Section 13. KRS 118.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS Chapters 116 to 121, candidates for offices to be voted for by the electors of one
(1) county or of a district less than one (1) county, except candidates for members of Congress,[ and]
members of the General Assembly, and Commonwealth's attorneys, shall file their nomination papers with
the county clerk of the county not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the
year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first
Monday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary. All nomination papers shall be
filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers may
be filed.
(2) Candidates for offices to be voted for by the electors of more than one (1) county, including candidates[and]
for members of Congress,[ and] members of the General Assembly, and Commonwealth's attorneys, shall file
their nomination papers with the Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday
in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first
Friday following the first Monday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary.
Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday
after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot.
All nomination papers shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last
date on which the papers may be filed.
(3) The Secretary of State or the county clerk shall examine the notification and declaration form of each
candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the proper officer shall notify the
candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.
(4) A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS 21.580 shall not
become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS
21.580(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.
Section 14. KRS 118.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A candidate for any office to be voted for at any regular election may be nominated by a petition of electors
qualified to vote for him or her, complying with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. No person
whose registration status is as a registered member of a political party shall be eligible to election as an
independent, or political organization, or political group candidate, nor shall any person be eligible to election
as an independent, or political organization, or political group candidate whose registration status was as a
registered member of a political party on January 1 immediately preceding the regular election for which the
person seeks to be a candidate. This restriction shall not apply to candidates to those offices specified in KRS
118.105(6), for supervisor of a soil and water conservation district, for candidates for mayor or legislative
body in cities of the home rule class, or to candidates participating in nonpartisan elections.
(2) The form of the petition shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State[State Board of Elections]. It shall be
signed by the candidate and by registered voters from the district or jurisdiction from which the candidate
seeks nomination. The petition shall include a declaration, sworn to by the candidate, that he or she possesses
all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Signatures for a
petition of nomination for a candidate seeking any office, excluding President of the United States in
accordance with KRS 118.591(1), shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday
after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot.
Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday
after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot.
A petition of nomination for a state officer, or any officer for whom all the electors of the state are entitled to
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
vote, shall contain five thousand (5,000) petitioners; for a representative in Congress from any congressional
district, or for any officer from any other district except as herein provided, four hundred (400) petitioners; for
a county officer, member of the General Assembly, or Commonwealth's attorney, one hundred (100)
petitioners; for a soil and water conservation district supervisor, twenty-five (25) petitioners; for a city officer
or board of education member, two (2) petitioners; and for an officer of a division less than a county, except
as[ herein] provided in this subsection, twenty (20) petitioners. It shall not be necessary that the signatures of
the petition be appended to one (1) paper. Each petitioner shall include the date he or she affixes the signature,
address of residence, and date of birth. Failure of a voter to include the signature affixation date, date of birth,
and address of residence shall result in the signature not being counted. A petitioner for the nomination of a
candidate may be counted for every petition to which his or her signature is affixed.
(3) Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the filing papers and shall not be printed on the
ballots as part of the candidate's name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be
accepted as the candidate's name.
(4) The Secretary of State and county clerks shall examine the petitions of all candidates who file with them to
determine whether each petition is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State or the county
clerk shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.
(5) A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS 21.580 shall not
become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS
21.580(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.
Section 15. KRS 118.367 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An independent, or political organization, or political group candidate required to file nomination papers
pursuant to KRS 118.365(5) shall be required to file a statement-of-candidacy form with the same office at
which nomination papers are filed. Candidates for federal office,[ and] candidates for mayor or legislative
body in cities of the home rule class participating in partisan elections, and candidates for a special election
or election for an unexpired term shall not be required to file a statement-of-candidacy form. The statement-
of-candidacy form shall be filed not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the
year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than April 1 preceding the
day fixed by law for holding of regular elections for the offices sought. If the office in which the statement-of-
candidacy form is to be filed is closed on April 1, the form may be filed on the next business day. The
statement-of-candidacy form shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time when filed on the last day on which
papers are permitted to be filed. No person shall file a statement-of-candidacy form for more than one (1)
public office during an election cycle.
(2) The statement-of-candidacy form shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State[State Board of Elections]. The
statement-of-candidacy form shall be signed by the candidate upon filing. No charge shall be assessed for the
filing of a statement-of-candidacy form. The Secretary of State and county clerks shall examine the statement-
of-candidacy form of each candidate who files the form to determine if there is an error. If an error has
occurred, the candidate shall be notified by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours.
Section 16. KRS 118A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 118A.100, no person's name shall appear on a ballot, including an absentee ballot,
for an office of the Court of Justice without first having been nominated as provided in this section.
(2) Each candidate for nomination shall file a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not earlier than
the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will
appear on the ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding the day
fixed by law for holding the primary for the office. The petition shall be sworn to before an officer authorized
to administer an oath by the candidate and by not less than two (2) registered voters from the district or circuit
from which he or she seeks nomination. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document
to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in
which the office will appear on the ballot. The petition shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place
of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers are permitted to be filed.
(3) (a) The petition for nomination shall be in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State[State Board of
Elections]. The petition shall include a declaration sworn to by the candidate, that he or she possesses
all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Titles,
ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the petition and shall not be printed on the ballots as

CHAPTER 175 13
part of the candidate's name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be
acceptable as the candidate's name.
(b) The Secretary of State shall certify the exact spelling and form of the name of the candidate to be
printed on all ballots in accordance with the requirements listed in KRS 118.129.
(4) The Secretary of State shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its
face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four
(24) hours of filing. The order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division if
divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State
at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the filing deadline for the primary as established in this
section and in KRS 83A.045 and 118.165.
(5) Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(a) preceding the primary, and after the order of names on
the ballot has been determined as required in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in the election of the
various candidates, the name and place of residence of each candidate for each office, by district or
circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, as specified in the petitions for nomination filed with
him or her; and
(b) Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which the names of candidates
shall be printed and the order in which they are to appear on the ballot.
(6) The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the
Secretary of State.
(7) The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots for the primary the names of the
candidates for offices in the Court of Justice.
(8) The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or columns or in a separate
line or lines and identified by the words "Judicial Ballot." The words "Vote for one," or "Vote for one in each
division," shall be printed on the ballot in an appropriate location. The office, numbered division if divisions
exist, and the candidates shall be clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem of any kind, nor any sign
indicating any candidate's political belief or party affiliation, shall be used on the ballots.
(9) The two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for nomination for justice or judge of a district or
circuit, or numbered division if divisions exist, shall be nominated. Certificates of nomination shall be issued
as provided in KRS 118A.190.
(10) If it appears after expiration of the time for filing petitions for nomination that there are not more than two (2)
candidates who have filed the necessary petitions for a place on the ballot in the regular election, no drawing
for ballot position shall be held and the Secretary of State shall immediately issue and file in the Secretary's
office certificates of nomination, and send copies to the candidates.
Section 17. KRS 119.015 is amended to read as follows:
Any county clerk or deputy county clerk who [falsely or ]fraudulently registers the name of any person, or permits
any person to register knowing that the person is not entitled to register, or who fails or refuses to deliver copies of
the registration records to a person entitled thereto, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
Section 18. KRS 119.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who falsely personates a registered voter, and receives and casts a ballot by means of such
personation, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. An attempt at such personation shall constitute a Class A
misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes at an election in this state
when he or she is a resident of another state or country, or votes more than once at an election, or votes by use
of the naturalization papers of another person, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who knowingly
votes or attempts to vote in a precinct other than the one in which he or she resides shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor, unless by voting in a precinct in which he or she does not live he is enabled to vote in a race or
on a matter in which he or she could not vote in his or her proper precinct in which case he or she shall be
guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who lends or hires his, hers, or another's naturalization papers to be
used for the purpose of voting shall be subject to the same penalty.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) Any person who has been convicted of a felony offense and has not previously been restored to their voting
rights who then knowingly votes or attempts to vote shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(4) Any resident of this state who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes[ at a regular or
special election before he has resided in this state thirty (30) days, or in the county and precinct where the
election is held the time required by law, or before he has attained full age, or] before he or she has become a
citizen, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(5) Any person who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes in a primary election
knowing that he or she is not qualified as provided in KRS 116.055, shall be guilty of a violation.
(6) Any person who applies for or receives a ballot at any voting place other than the one at which he or she is
entitled to vote, under circumstances not constituting a violation of any of the provisions of subsections (1) to
(3) of this section, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 19. KRS 132.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local governmental entity" includes a county fiscal court and legislative body of a city, urban-county
government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, or
other taxing district; and
(b) "Next regular election" means the regular election that occurs immediately after all statutory
requirements for levying a property tax rate have been met, regardless of whether the election occurs in
the same or a subsequent calendar year as the levy of the property tax rate.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the portion of a tax rate levied by an
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a local governmental entity or district board of
education subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023, 132.027, and 160.470, shall
go into effect forty-five (45) days after its passage.
2. When a tax rate is levied by a district board of education or other taxing district that is primarily
located in a county containing an urban-county government or a consolidated local government,
the portion of a tax rate levied by an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a district board of
education or other taxing district subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023,
132.027, and 160.470, shall go into effect fifty (50) days after its passage.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of this
subsection, any three (3) qualified voters, who reside in the area where the tax levy will be imposed,
may commence petition proceedings to protest the passage of the ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion by filing an affidavit with the county clerk. The affidavit shall state:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within the same forty-five (45)
day or fifty (50) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. For petition committees filing petitions in response to a tax rate levied by a district board of
education or other taxing district that is primarily located in a county containing an urban-county
government or a consolidated local government, whether or not the petition committee is willing
to incur all of the expenses associated with electronic petition signatures. If the petition
committee is not willing to incur all of the expenses, then electronic petition signatures shall not
be allowed for the petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the filing of a valid petition under
this section;

CHAPTER 175 15
2. Notify the petition committee that the clerk will publish a notice identifying the tax levy being
challenged and providing the names and addresses of the petition committee in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county, if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of publishing the notice
determined in accordance with the provisions of KRS 424.160 at the time of the filing of
the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk shall publish the notice
within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the appropriate local governmental entity or district board of
education.
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and style and shall be assembled
in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more than one (1) voting
precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements of the Uniform Electronic
Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street address, birth month, and
birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. i. Except for petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a district board of
education, the petition shall be signed by a number of registered and qualified
voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the
total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential election.
ii. For petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a district board of education,
the petition shall be signed by at least five thousand (5,000) registered and qualified
voters residing in the affected jurisdiction or signed by a number of registered and
qualified voters residing in the affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent
(10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential election,
whichever is less.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining whether the required
number of petition signatures has been obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition signatures have been incurred
in accordance with paragraph (b)6. of this subsection;
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the requirements of this subsection;
and
iii. The petition was filed in response to a tax rate levied by a district board of
education or other taxing district that is primarily located in a county containing an
urban-county government or a consolidated local government.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not invalidate the entire page
of the petition, but shall instead result in the invalid petition signature being stricken and
not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall be
suspended from going into effect until after the election referred to in subsection (3) of this section is
held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient and no further action may be taken
pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the presiding officer of the appropriate local governmental
entity or district board of education that the petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days
of the receipt of the petition, make a determination of whether the petition contains enough signatures
of qualified voters to place the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion before the voters.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to the petition committee and
the local governmental entity or district board of education within the thirty (30) day period provided
for in paragraph (f) of this subsection that the petition is properly presented and in compliance with the
provisions of this section, and that the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion levying the tax will be
placed before the voters for approval.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within the thirty (30) day period
provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection, notify, in writing, the petition committee and the local
governmental entity or district board of education of the specific deficiencies found. Notification shall
be sent by certified mail and shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county containing the local governmental entity or district board of education
levying the tax. If there is not a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notification, then
the notification shall be posted at the courthouse door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final review by the Circuit Court
of the county in which the local governmental entity or district board of education is located, and shall
be limited to the validity of the county clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the county clerk's
final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the issuance of the clerk's final determination.
(j) The local governmental entity or district board of education may cause the cancellation of the election
by reconsidering and amending the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a tax rate which will
produce no more revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in
KRS 132.010, than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax
rate defined in KRS 132.010 from real property. The action by the local governmental entity or district
board of education shall be valid only if taken within fifteen (15) days following the date the clerk finds
the petition to be sufficient.
(3) (a) If an election is necessary under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section:
1. The local governmental entity shall cause to be submitted to the voters of the district at the next
regular election, the question as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied; or
2. The district board of education shall cause to be submitted to the voters of the district in a called
common school election not less than fifty (50)[thirty-five (35)] days nor more than sixty
(60)[forty-five (45)] days from the date the signatures on the petition are validated by the county
clerk, or at the next regular election, at the option of the district board of education, the question
as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied. The cost of a called common school election
shall be borne by the school district holding the election, which shall post bond with the Circuit
Court to cover all costs of the election within five (5) days after the date the clerk finds the
petition to be sufficient. Any called common school election shall comply with the provisions of
KRS 118.025.
(b) If an election under paragraph (a) of this subsection is held in conjunction with a regular election, the
question as to whether the property tax rate shall be levied shall be submitted to the county clerk no
later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(c) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question shall be framed to ask whether
the voter is for the levy of the property tax rate. If a majority of the votes cast upon the question oppose
its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall not go into effect. If a majority of the votes
cast upon the question favor its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion shall become
effective.
(d) If the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion fails to pass pursuant to an election held under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the property tax rate which will produce four percent (4%) more revenues from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, than the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, shall be levied without further
approval by the local governmental entity or district board of education.

CHAPTER 175 17
(e) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial terms, for or against any
public question that appears on the ballot in this subsection. For purposes of this section, "local" means
and includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, charter county, or special district.
(4) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a local governmental entity or district board of
education has not established a final tax rate as of September 15, due to the recall provisions of this section,
KRS 68.245, 132.027, or 160.470, regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in KRS 133.220 for all
districts having a tax rate established by that date; and a second set of bills shall be prepared and collected in
the regular manner, according to the provisions of KRS Chapter 132, upon establishment of final tax rates by
the remaining districts.
(5) If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to conform with the second billing date.
(6) All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the taxing district or districts requiring the second
billing.
Section 20. KRS 160.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In independent school districts, the members of the school board shall be elected from the district at large. In
county school districts, members shall be elected from divisions.
(2) The board of education of each county school district shall, not later than July 1, 1940, divide its district into
five (5) divisions containing integral voting precincts and as equal in population insofar as is practicable. In
first dividing the county district into divisions the board shall, if more than one (1) of its members reside in
one (1) division, determine by lot which member from that division shall represent that division, and which
members shall represent the divisions in which no member resides. The members so determined to represent
divisions in which no member resides shall be considered the members from those divisions until their terms
expire, and thereafter the members from those divisions shall be nominated and elected as provided in KRS
160.200 and 160.220 to 160.250.
(3) Any changes made in division boundary lines shall be to make divisions as equal in population and containing
integral voting precincts insofar as is practical. No change may be made in division boundary lines less than
five (5) years after the last change in any division lines, except in case of merger of districts, a change in
territory due to annexation, or to allow compliance with KRS 117.055(2).
(4) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, if one hundred (100) residents of a
county school district division petition the Kentucky Board of Education stating that the school district
divisions are not divided as nearly equal in population as can reasonably be expected, the chief state
school officer shall cause an investigation to determine the validity of the petition, the investigation to
be completed within thirty (30) days after receipt of the petition.
(b) If the investigation reveals the school district to be unequally divided according to population, the
Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state school officer, shall order
the local board of education to make changes in school district divisions as are necessary to equalize
population within the five (5) school divisions.
(c) If any board fails to comply with the order of the Kentucky Board of Education within thirty (30) days
or prior to August 1 in any year in which any members of the board are to be elected, members shall be
elected from the district at large until the order of the Kentucky Board of Education has been complied
with.
(d) No change shall be made in the boundary of any division under the provisions of this subsection after
June[August] 1 in the year in which a member of the school board is to be elected from any division.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in counties containing a city of the first class
wherein a merger pursuant to KRS 160.041 shall have been accomplished, there shall be seven (7) divisions as
equal in population as is practicable, with members elected from divisions. To be eligible to be elected from a
division, a candidate must reside in that division. The divisions, based upon 1970 United States Census Bureau
Reports on total population by census tracts for Jefferson County, Kentucky shall be as follows: Division One
shall include census tracts 1-28; Division Two shall include census tracts 29-35, 47-53, 57-74, 80-84, 93, 129,
130; Division Three shall include census tracts 75-79, 85-88, 98-106, 107.01, 108; Division Four shall include
census tracts 121.01, 123-128; Division Five shall include census tracts 36-46, 56, 90, 120, 121.02, 122;
Division Six shall include census tracts 54, 55, 91, 92, 94, 95, 110.02, 113, 114, 117.01, 117.02, 118, 119;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Division Seven shall include census tracts 89, 96, 97, 107.02, 109, 110.01, 111, 112, 115, 116, 117.03, 131,
132. The terms of the members to be elected, KRS 160.044 notwithstanding, shall be four (4) years and the
election for the initial four (4) year terms shall be as follows: The election of the members from Divisions
Two, Four and Seven shall be held at the next regular November election following the effective date of the
merger pursuant to KRS 160.041, and the election of the members from Divisions One, Three, Five and Six
shall be held at the regular November election two (2) years thereafter.
(6) In counties containing cities of the first class, responsibility for the establishment or the changing of school
board division boundaries shall be with the local board of education, subject to the review and approval of the
county board of elections. Where division and census tract boundaries do not coincide with existing election
precinct boundaries, school board divisions shall be redrawn to comply with precinct boundaries. In no
instance shall precinct boundaries be redrawn nor shall a precinct be divided to accommodate the drawing of
school board division lines. Precinct boundaries nearest existing school board division boundaries shall
become the new division boundary. All changes under this statute shall be completed on or before January 1,
1979, and on or before January 1 in any succeeding year in which a member of the school board is to be
elected from any division. A record of all changes in division lines shall be kept in the offices of the county
board of education and the county board of elections. The board of education shall publish all changes
pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. A copy of the newspaper in which the notice is published shall be filed with the
chief state school officer within ten (10) days following its publication.
Section 21. KRS 118.631 is amended to read as follows:
Upon completion of the official canvass of the results of the primary by the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of
State shall certify to the state chairman of each political party participating in the presidential preference primary the
following:
(1) The names of the candidates entitled to delegate votes under provisions of KRS 118.641;
(2) The total vote received by each;
(3) A declaration that the results of the presidential preference primary, in accordance with the division of votes
reflected by the official canvass, shall be the official vote cast by each political party at its national convention,
on the first ballot only, and shall be designated by KRS 118.555[118.551] to 118.651 as an automatic vote,
expressing the will of the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(4) After the vote on the first ballot by the political party at its national convention, as required by this section, all
responsibility under KRS 118.555[118.551] to 118.651 shall terminate and further balloting shall be the
prerogative of the political parties as might be prescribed by the rules of such political parties.
Section 22. KRS 118.641 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The political parties in distributing authorized delegate votes among party candidates shall select one (1) of the
following methods of distribution:
(a) The candidates receiving the highest number of votes, provided each candidate receives at least fifteen
percent (15%) of the total vote cast by his or her political party, shall be awarded a pro rata portion of
the authorized delegate vote of his or her political party as follows:
1. The total vote received by the candidates qualifying under the provisions of KRS
118.555[118.551] to 118.651 and subsections herein shall, when combined, be equal to one
hundred percent (100%);
2. Each such candidate shall share in the total percentage in direct proportion to the total vote
received by him or her mathematically determined to be the percentage of the aggregate vote
which represents one hundred percent (100%);
3. Each political party shall appropriate such percentage, as is determined by this section, to the
total number of delegate votes as are allotted by the national committee of each party; or
(b) The candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast by his or her political party shall be awarded a
pro rata portion of the authorized delegate vote of his or her political party in compliance with the state
party rules for that party.
(2) Each political party shall, on the first ballot at its national convention, cast this Commonwealth's vote for the
candidates as determined by the primary or party caucus and calculated under this section or under party rules,
whichever is applicable. [ ]Provided, however, that in the event of the death or withdrawal of a candidate

CHAPTER 175 19
receiving votes under this section prior to the tabulation of the first ballot, any delegate votes allocated to such
candidate shall be considered uncommitted. Withdrawal shall mean notice in writing by the candidate to the
chairperson[chairman] of the Kentucky delegation prior to the first ballot.
Section 23. KRS 118.651 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the responsibility of the state chairperson[chairman] of each political party to notify his or her party's
national committee, no later than January 30 of each year in which such presidential primary shall be conducted, of
the provisions contained herein relating to the automatic vote on the first ballot as required under KRS 118.555 to
118.651[118.551 to 118.641].
Section 24. KRS 83A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In any city which has under the provisions of KRS 83A.045 or 83A.050 required nonpartisan city elections, no
person shall be elected to city office except as provided in this section or as otherwise provided in this chapter
relating to nonpartisan elections.
(2) No person shall be elected to city office without being nominated in the manner provided in this section at a
nonpartisan primary to be held at the time prescribed by KRS Chapters 116 to 121, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter. Nonpartisan primaries shall be conducted by the same officers, chosen and acting in
the same manner, with the same rights and duties as in regular elections.
(3) Each applicant for nomination shall, not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November
of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the last date
prescribed by the election law generally for filing notification and declaration forms with the county clerk as
provided in KRS 83A.047, file a petition of nomination, which shall be in the form prescribed by the State
Board of Elections signed by at least two (2) registered voters in the city. Each voter may sign individual
petitions equal to the number of offices to be filled. If a voter signs petitions for more candidates than he or she
is authorized, he or she shall be counted as a petitioner for the candidate whose petition is filed first.
(4) The county clerk shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If
there is an error, the county clerk shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of
filing.
(5) Immediately upon expiration of the time for filing petitions, the county clerk shall have published in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424 the names of the applicants as they will appear before the voters at the
primary.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section shall not apply if it appears, immediately upon expiration of the time for filing
petitions, that there are not more than two (2) applicants for nomination for each city office to be filled, or,
when the nominations are for city legislative body members in cities electing legislative body members at
large, and there are no more than twice the number of applicants for nomination for the number of offices to be
filled. In that case, the applicants for nomination shall thereby be nominated and no drawing for ballot position
nor primary election shall be held for that office.
(7) The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the
county clerk.
(8) If, before the time of certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose petition
has been filed in the office of the county clerk dies or notifies the clerk in writing, signed and properly
notarized, that he or she will not accept the nomination, the clerk shall not cause the candidate's name to be
printed on the ballot.
(9) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears
thereon shall withdraw pursuant to KRS 118.212, be disqualified, or die:
(a) Neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report on the
official certification of[tabulate or record] the votes cast for the candidate;
(b) The county clerk shall provide notices to the precinct election officers who shall see that a notice is
conspicuously displayed at the polling place advising voters of the change, and that votes for the
candidate shall not be disclosed or reported[tabulated or recorded]. If the county clerk learns of the
death, disqualification, or withdrawal at least five (5) days prior to the election and provides the notices
required by this subsection and the precinct officers fail to post the notices at the polling place, the
officers shall be guilty of a violation; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) In a primary, if there are only one (1) or two (2) remaining candidates on the ballot for that office,
following the withdrawal, disqualification, or death of the other candidate or candidates, neither the
precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report on the official
certification of[tabulate or record] the votes for the remaining candidate or candidates, and the officer
with whom the remaining candidate or candidates has filed his or her nomination papers shall
immediately issue and file in his or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining candidate or
candidates and send a copy to the remaining candidate or candidates.
(10) Names of applicants for each nomination shall be placed before the voters of the city. The voters shall be
instructed to vote for one (1) candidate, except when there is more than one (1) candidate for which voters may
vote, the instruction "vote for up to .... candidates" shall be used on the ballot. No party designation or emblem
of any kind nor any sign indicating any applicant's political belief or party affiliation shall be used.
(11) Persons qualified to vote at a regular election shall be qualified to vote at a nonpartisan primary and the law
applicable to challenges made at a regular election shall be applicable to challenges made at a nonpartisan
primary.
(12) Votes shall be counted as provided in general election laws, pursuant to KRS Chapters 116 to 121, and the
result shall be published as provided in KRS Chapter 424.
(13) The two (2) applicants receiving the highest number of votes for nomination for each city office shall be
nominated; or where the nominations are for city legislative body members in cities electing legislative body
members at large, there shall be nominated the number of applicants receiving the highest number of votes
equal to twice the number of offices to be filled. If two (2) candidates are tied for the second highest number of
votes in a mayoral election, the names of those two (2) candidates, plus the name of the candidate receiving
the highest number of votes, shall be placed upon the ballot.
(14) At the regular election following a nonpartisan primary, the names of the successful nominees and candidates
who have filed a petition of candidacy as provided in this chapter to fill a vacancy shall be placed before the
voters.
(15) The nominee or candidate receiving the greater number of votes cast for each city office shall be elected.
(16) KRS Chapters 116 to 121 prescribing duties of county clerks and other public officers in the conduct of
elections shall be applicable in all respects to nonpartisan city elections, except no election officer or other
person within a polling place shall tell or indicate to a voter, by word of mouth or otherwise, the political
affiliation of any candidate for city office.
Section 25. KRS 83A.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The election to fill the regular term of a nonpartisan city office shall be conducted in the manner prescribed in
KRS 83A.165 when, in a regular election for nonpartisan city office no candidates nominated to an office as
provided in KRS 83A.170 are available due to death, incapacity, or withdrawal, or when city legislative body
members are to be elected at large and there are fewer nominees than there are offices to be filled, or when a
city has eliminated the primary pursuant to KRS 83A.045.
(2) Each candidate shall, not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year
before the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the last date prescribed by the
election law generally for filing petitions of nomination with the county clerk as provided in KRS 83A.047,
file a petition for candidacy. The petition shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections and shall be
signed by at least two (2) registered voters in the city. Each voter may sign individual petitions equal to the
number of offices to be filled. If a voter signs petitions for more candidates than he or she is authorized, he or
she shall be counted as a petitioner for the candidate whose petition is filed first.
(3) The county clerk shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If
there is an error, the county clerk shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of
filing.
(4) The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the
county clerk.
(5) If, before the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose petition has been
filed in the office of the county clerk, dies or notifies the clerk in writing, signed and properly notarized, that
he or she will not accept the election, the clerk shall not cause his or her name to be printed on the ballot.

CHAPTER 175 21
(6) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears
thereon shall withdraw pursuant to KRS 118.212, be disqualified, or die:
(a) Neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report on the
official certification of[tabulate or record] the votes cast for the candidate;
(b) The county clerk shall provide notices to the precinct election officers who shall see that a notice is
conspicuously displayed at the polling place advising voters of the change, and that votes for the
candidate shall not be disclosed or reported[tabulated or recorded]. If the county clerk learns of the
death, disqualification, or withdrawal at least five (5) days prior to the election and provides the notices
required by this subsection and the precinct officers fail to post the notices at the polling place, the
officers shall be guilty of a violation;
(c) If there is only one (1) remaining candidate on the ballot for that office in a primary, following the
withdrawal, disqualification, or death of the other candidate or candidates, neither the precinct election
officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report[tabulate or record] the votes for the
remaining candidate, and the officer with whom the remaining candidate has filed his or her nomination
papers shall immediately issue and file in his or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining
candidate and send a copy to the remaining candidate.
Section 26. KRS 118.212 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If, before the time of certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot provided in KRS 118.215, any
candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office
of the Secretary of State dies, is disqualified, or notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed and properly
notarized that he or she will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall not certify his
or her name.
(2) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.215, any
candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office
of the county clerk dies, is disqualified, or notifies the clerk, in the manner described in subsection (1) of this
section, that he or she will not accept the nomination or election, the clerk shall ensure that notice is provided
to the appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.215, any
candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office
of the Secretary of State dies, is disqualified, or notifies the Secretary of State in the manner described in
subsection (1) of this section, that he or she will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State
shall immediately notify the appropriate county clerk, and the clerk shall ensure that notice is provided to the
appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.215, any
candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall officially withdraw, be disqualified, or die, neither the
precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report on the official certification
of[tabulate or record] the votes cast for the candidate; and, if there is only one (1) remaining candidate on the
ballot for that office in a primary election, following the withdrawal, disqualification, or death of the other
candidate or candidates, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose
or report on the official certification of[tabulate or record] the votes for the remaining candidate, and the
officer with whom the remaining candidate has filed his or her nomination papers shall immediately issue and
file in his or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining candidate and send a copy to the
remaining candidate.
(5) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot as provided in KRS 118.215, any
candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall officially withdraw, be disqualified, or die, the county clerk
shall provide a notice to the precinct election officers who shall see that the notice is conspicuously displayed
at the polling place advising voters of the change, and that votes for the candidate shall not be disclosed or
reported[tabulated or recorded]. If the county clerk learns of the death, disqualification, or withdrawal at least
five (5) days prior to the election and provides the notice required by this subsection and the precinct officers
fail to post the notice at the polling place, the precinct officers shall be guilty of a violation subject to a fine of
not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
Section 27. KRS 118A.150 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) In certification of candidates for judicial office, no reference shall be made to political affiliation.
(2) The Secretary of State shall not knowingly certify to the county clerk of any county the name of any candidate
who has not filed the required nomination or candidacy papers, nor knowingly fail to certify the name of any
candidate who has filed the required nomination or candidacy papers.
(3) No county clerk shall knowingly cause to be printed on any ballots or absentee ballots for any election, the
name of a candidate for an office of the Court of Justice who has not been certified in the manner specified in
this chapter.
(4) If, before the time of certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot provided for in this chapter, any
candidate whose petition or certificate of nomination or petition for candidacy has been filed, dies, is
disqualified, or notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed and properly notarized, that he or she will not
accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall not certify his or her name.
(5) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose petition or
certificate of nomination or petition for candidacy has been filed, dies, is disqualified, or notifies the Secretary
of State in the manner described in subsection (4) of this section, that he or she will not accept the nomination
or election, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the appropriate county clerk, and the clerk shall
ensure that notice is provided to the appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(6) If after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the
ballot shall withdraw, be disqualified, or die, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of
elections shall disclose report on the official certification of[tabulate or record] the votes cast for the
candidate; and, in a primary, if there are only one (1) or two (2) remaining candidates on the ballot for that
office, following the withdrawal, disqualification, or death of the other candidate or candidates, neither the
precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall disclose or report on the official certification
of[tabulate or record] the votes for the remaining candidate or candidates, and the officer with whom the
remaining candidate or candidates has filed his or her nomination papers shall immediately issue and file in his
or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining candidate or candidates and send a copy to the
remaining candidate or candidates.
(7) If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the
ballot shall withdraw pursuant to KRS 118.212, be disqualified, or die, the county clerk shall provide notices
to the precinct election officers who shall see that a notice is conspicuously displayed at the polling place
advising voters of the change, and that votes for the candidate shall not be disclosed or reported[tabulated or
recorded]. If the county clerk learns of the death, disqualification, or withdrawal at least five (5) days prior to
the election and provides the notices required by this subsection and the precinct officers fail to post the
notices at the polling place, the officers shall be guilty of a violation, subject to a fine of not less than ten
dollars ($10) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
Section 28. KRS 27A.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall send certified notices of conviction of a felony to the State
Board of Elections within ten (10) days after the conviction becomes final[, including the exhaustion of all
appeals,] with regard to any person before the courts of the Commonwealth.
(2) By July 24, 2026, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall send to the State Board of Elections an all-
time list of persons convicted of a felony, including any persons convicted of a felony whose case is
currently pending appeal, who are currently ineligible to vote. The State Board of Elections shall cause the
removal of the name of any person identified through the list as ineligible to vote from the voter registration
records it maintains by August 4, 2026.
Section 29. KRS 83A.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A mayor shall be elected by the voters of each city at a regular election. A candidate for mayor shall be a
resident of the city for not less than one (1) year prior to his or her election. His or her term of office shall
begin on the first day of January following his or her election and shall be for four (4) years and until his or her
successor qualifies. If a person is elected or appointed as mayor in response to a vacancy and serves less than
four (4) calendar years, then that period of service shall not be considered for purposes of re-election a term of
office. A mayor shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, shall be a qualified voter in the city, and shall
reside in the city throughout his or her term of office.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor, the following provisions shall apply:

CHAPTER 175 23
(a) The legislative body of the city shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days;
(b) A member of the legislative body in any city organized and governed under the commission plan as
provided by KRS 83A.140 or city manager plan as provided by KRS 83A.150 may vote for himself;
(c) A member of the legislative body in any city organized and governed under the mayor-council plan as
provided by KRS 83A.130 and in any city of the first class organized under the mayor-alderman plan as
provided by KRS Chapter 83 shall not vote for himself; and
(d) The legislative body shall elect from among its members an individual to preside over meetings of the
legislative body during any vacancy in the office of mayor in accordance with the provisions of KRS
83A.130 to 83A.150.
(3) When voting to fill the vacancy created by a resignation of a mayor the resigning mayor shall not vote on his
or her successor.
(4) Each legislative body member shall be elected at large by the voters of each city at a regular election. A
candidate for a legislative body shall be a resident of the city for not less than one (1) year prior to his or her
election. His or her term of office shall begin on the first day of January following his or her election and shall
be for two (2) years, except as provided by KRS 83A.050. A member shall be at least eighteen (18) years of
age, shall be a qualified voter in the city, and shall reside in the city throughout his or her term of office.
(5) (a) If one (1) or more vacancies on a legislative body occur in a way that one (1) or more members remain
seated, the remaining members shall within thirty (30) days fill the vacancies one (1) at a time, giving
each new appointee reasonable notice of his or her selection as will enable him or her to meet and act
with the remaining members in making further appointments until all vacancies are filled.
(b) If a majority of the membership on a legislative body is vacated as a result of a judgment by a Circuit
Court or on appeal under subsection (4) of Section 37 of this Act because of an election error due to
no fault of any candidate or fraud, a new special election shall be called and held as soon as
practicable for the bona fide candidates only. Members of the legislative body whose term expires
shall remain in office until the contest and any appeals of the regular election are complete and
final.
(c) If vacancies occur in a way that all seats become vacant, the Governor shall appoint qualified persons to
fill the vacancies sufficient to constitute a quorum. Remaining vacancies shall be filled as provided in
this section.
(6) If for any reason, any vacancy in the office of mayor or the legislative body is not filled within thirty (30) days
after it occurs, the Governor shall promptly fill the vacancy by appointment of a qualified person who shall
serve for the same period as if otherwise appointed.
(7) No vacancy by reason of voluntary resignation in the office of mayor or on a legislative body shall occur
unless a written resignation which specifies a resignation date is tendered to the legislative body. The
resignation may be submitted through electronic mail if it originates from the official's electronic mail address
and includes also the official's handwritten signature. The resignation shall be effective at the next regular or
special meeting of the city legislative body occurring on or after the date specified in the written letter of
resignation. If a resignation date is not specified, the written resignation shall be deemed to become effective
at the first regular or special meeting of the legislative body occurring on or after its receipt.
(8) Pursuant to KRS 118.305(7), if a vacancy occurs which is required by law to be filled temporarily by
appointment, the legislative body or the Governor, whichever is designated to make the appointment, shall
immediately notify in writing both the county clerk and the Secretary of State of the vacancy.
(9) Except in cities of the first class, any elected officer, in case of misconduct, incapacity, or willful neglect in the
performance of the duties of his or her office, may be removed from office by a unanimous vote of the
members of the legislative body exclusive of any member to be removed, who shall not vote in the
deliberation of his or her removal. No elected officer shall be removed without having been given the right to a
full public hearing. The officer, if removed, shall have the right to appeal to the Circuit Court of the county
and the appeal shall be on the record. No officer so removed shall be eligible to fill the office vacated before
the expiration of the term to which originally elected.
(10) Removal of an elected officer in cities of the first class shall be governed by the provisions of KRS 83.660.
SECTION 30. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 116 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) The State Board of Elections is authorized to enter into agreements with agencies of the federal government
to identify individuals who are deceased or who are not citizens of the United States but are registered to
vote in this state.
(2) (a) Any agreement entered into in order to identify individuals who are not citizens of the United States
but are registered to vote in this state shall have its terms agreed to in a written memorandum of
understanding or similar document signed by individuals authorized to do so from the federal agency
and the State Board of Elections.
(b) The document agreed to shall contain, at a minimum, provisions guaranteeing the following:
1. The federal agency shall be provided with a copy of the roster of all qualified registered voters
within the state maintained by the State Board of Elections pursuant to KRS 117.025;
2. The copy of the roster that is provided to the federal agency shall include only the name, date
of birth, and last four (4) digits of the Social Security number, if available, of registered voters
within the state;
3. The copy of the roster that is provided to the federal agency shall not include any other
information, including but not limited to the residential or mailing address, driver's license
number, voting history, or political party affiliation of registered voters within the state; and
4. The federal agency shall be prohibited from acquiring a copy of the roster under KRS
117.025(3)(i).
(3) For all individuals who are identified as being a noncitizen through an agreement authorized by this
section, the State Board of Elections shall:
(a) Mark the individual's registration in the roster of all qualified registered voters maintained pursuant
to KRS 117.025(3)(a) in such a way that indicates on the voter registration system and any e-poll
book that the individual has been identified as a noncitizen; and
(b) Mail the individual a notice stating that he or she has been identified by the federal government as
being a noncitizen who is registered to vote in the Commonwealth, and informing the individual of
the steps he or she must take before he or she may cast a ballot again.
(4) An individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters shall not cast a ballot until his or
her United States citizenship is verified. To verify his or her United States citizenship, he or she shall
present one (1) or more of the following at the office of his or her county clerk:
(a) A United States birth certificate that meets all the following requirements:
1. Is issued by the city, county, or state of birth;
2. Lists the applicant's full name, date of birth, and place of birth;
3. Lists the applicant's parent or parents and their full names;
4. Has the signature of the city, county, or state registrar;
5. Has the date it was filed with the registrar's office; and
6. Has the seal or stamp of the city, county, or state in which it was issued;
(b) An undamaged United States passport that is or was valid for ten (10) years for adults or five (5)
years for children under sixteen (16) and does not contain a United States National endorsement;
(c) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad or Certification of Birth;
(d) A Certificate of Naturalization; or
(e) A Certificate of Citizenship.
(5) If an individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters presents documentation verifying
his or her United States citizenship at his or her county clerk's office, the county clerk shall make a copy of
the documentation presented and record the copy in the voter registration system. The county clerk shall
then immediately notify the State Board of Elections of the presented documentation and the board shall
remove the mark from the voter's registration that indicates he or she was identified as a noncitizen on the
roster of qualified voters.

CHAPTER 175 25
(6) If an individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters appears at a voting location to
vote, the election officer shall allow the voter to cast a provisional ballot only after the voter has attested
under penalty of perjury that he or she is a United States citizen on a form provided by the State Board of
Elections.
(7) An individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters shall be purged from the roster of
qualified voters if the individual does not verify his or her United States citizenship before the day after the
date of the second general election for federal office that occurs after the individual was identified as a
noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters.
(8) The voter registration of all individuals who are identified as being a noncitizen through an agreement
authorized by this section shall be forwarded by the State Board of Elections to the Unit of Election
Investigations and Security within the Office of the Attorney General. If the citizenship of an individual
identified as a noncitizen is later verified by the applicable federal agency or through the procedures in this
section, the State Board of Elections shall notify the Unit of Election Investigations and Security within the
Office of the Attorney General of that fact.
Section 31. KRS 116.113 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon receipt of notification from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or other reliable sources
of the death of a person, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the
name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter's name may be
removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special
election.
(b) To ensure that the State Board of Elections accurately removes names from the voter registration
records it maintains, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide a copy of the lifetime
Kentucky death records to the State Board of Elections on or before July 1 of each year.
(2) Upon receipt of notification from the circuit clerk that a person has been declared incompetent, the State Board
of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration
records it maintains, except that no voter's name may be removed during the period of time the registration
books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.
(3) Upon receipt of notification from the Administrative Office of the Courts that a person has been excused from
jury duty for not being a citizen of the United States, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days
cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no
voter's name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary,
general, or special election.
(4) Upon receipt of notification from the Administrative Office of the Courts or the United States Department of
Justice that a person has been convicted of a felony offense, including persons convicted of a felony offense
whose case is currently on appeal, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of
the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter's name may be
removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special
election.
(5) Upon receipt of notification from a local or state jurisdiction that a voter has registered to vote in the new local
or state jurisdiction outside of the Commonwealth, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause
the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records that it maintains, except that no
voter's name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary,
regular election, or special election.
(6) (a) Following the purge of a name from the records of the State Board of Elections:[,]
1. The state board shall notify the clerk of the county in which the voter lived of the action; and
2. The county clerk shall within ten (10) days update the county voter registration files to reflect the
necessary change.
(b) 1. If a protest is filed by the voter, the county board shall hear it at its next regular monthly meeting.
2. If the county board decides in favor of the protesting voter, the voter's registration record shall be
restored, including his or her voting record.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. If the protest is filed while the registration books are closed and the county board decides in
favor of the protesting voter, the county board shall issue the voter an "Authorization to Vote"
for the upcoming election and the voter's record shall be restored when the registration books
open following the election.
Section 32. KRS 117.155 is amended to read as follows:
The county clerk shall place all ballots required to be placed upon voting equipment in such a manner as will most
nearly conform to the plan of arrangement prescribed by the Secretary of State under KRS 118.215. The county clerk
shall then see that the counters referred to in KRS 117.125(1)(q)[(17)] and (r)[(18)] are set at zero, and shall lock the
operating device and mechanism and the devices protecting the counters and ballots, which shall then be covered
with a tamper-resistant seal. The county clerk shall then enter in an appropriate book, opposite the number of each
precinct the distinguishing number of the voting equipment or the unique designation to be used in that precinct.
Section 33. KRS 117.205 is amended to read as follows:
Before the polls are open, and before permitting any person to vote on the day of the election, the election officers
shall examine the voting equipment to ascertain whether it has been operated since the counters referred to in KRS
117.125(1)(q)[(17)] and (1)(r)[(18)] were set at zero, and to ascertain whether the ballots are arranged as previously
specified. If the voting equipment indicates that it has been operated or if the ballots are not properly arranged, the
officers shall not unlock the operating device or mechanism, but shall immediately secure the attendance of the
county clerk and one (1) member of the county board of elections other than the county clerk, who shall reset the
counters at zero and relock the device covering the counters, or properly arrange the ballots, as the case may be, in
the presence of the election officers. If the attendance of members of the board of elections cannot be obtained before
the opening of the polls or within one (1) hour thereafter, the election officers shall notify the county clerk of the
foregoing facts and obtain from the county clerk reserve voting equipment, and proceed to conduct the election. Any
reserve voting equipment shall have been certified for use at the election by the county board of elections and
prepared for use at the election by the election officers in the precinct in the same manner as the original voting
equipment was prepared for the election. The voting equipment found to have been so operated shall be returned
immediately to the custody of the county clerk, whose duty it shall be to promptly repair same so that it may be used
as reserve voting equipment in the election if needed.
Section 34. KRS 117.383 is amended to read as follows:
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter
13A which shall maintain the maximum degree of correctness, impartiality, and efficiency of the procedures of
voting and shall provide methods to:
(1) Count, tabulate, and record votes;
(2) Place items on any ballot which shall, as closely as possible, follow the requirements pertaining to ballots;
(3) Design the ballots to include a system to ensure an accurate record of all voting activities;
(4) Instruct voters in the use of the voting system, including any ballot marking device;
(5) Provide for checking the accuracy of the voting system;
(6) Provide necessary supplies, including those necessary for a write-in vote, to ensure voter privacy;
(7) Provide for the conducting and review of an audit of any component of a voting system or any voting
equipment, and a review of any audit log;
(8) Provide for the conducting and review of an election audit which shall establish the protocol by which ballots
are checked, compared, and verified with the results produced by vote tallying equipment to ensure accuracy
through a hand-to-eye audit defined and conducted as follows:
(a) To validate the accuracy and fidelity of the vote tabulation, the Secretary of State or his or her designee
shall randomly select, in all counties of the Commonwealth, one (1) ballot scanner and one (1) race
tabulated on that scanner, which shall have more than ten (10) votes cast, for a hand-to-eye audit to be
performed by each county board of elections or its designee. Counties shall send a list for selection to
the Secretary of State's Office that only includes ballot scanners which recorded more than ten (10)
votes cast;
(b) The sealed ballot boxes and signed tabulator tally tape or record from election day, as established in
KRS 117.275, shall be provided by the county board of elections at an agreed upon location, and shall

CHAPTER 175 27
be accessible for public viewing. The sealed ballots are only to be unsealed in the presence of the
county board of elections or its designee and public witnesses;
(c) A minimum of two (2) qualified poll workers, not of the same political party, shall be selected from
lists of available volunteers, sworn in by the county board of elections or its designee to do the hand-to-
eye audit, and compensated at the local poll worker rate. A video recording device shall be used for
recording the event and it may be streamed for public internet viewing. A request under the Kentucky
Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884, for this video after an election shall be made during the sixty
(60) consecutive days following the election, and the video may be disposed of after those sixty (60)
days, or upon compliance with the Kentucky Open Records Act or the closure of an investigation or any
litigation, including appeals, in a District, Circuit, or federal court, whichever is later;
(d) Ballots are to be aligned for stacking as needed, then viewed one (1) at a time, with each volunteer
making a tally mark on a tally sheet for each vote cast for each candidate. Any ballots that are disputed
or unclearly marked shall be set aside and the county board of elections or its designee shall determine
voter intent;
(e) Once the hand-to-eye audit is completed, each volunteer shall add up the tally marks for each candidate,
write down a total number of votes for each candidate, and sign the tally sheet. The county board of
elections or its designee shall verify if the two (2) separate hand-to-eye tallies match. If the two (2)
hand-to-eye tallies do not match each other, the process must be repeated until the totals are matching.
Once this occurs, the county board of elections or its designee shall also verify the tallies by signing
each tally sheet. Then, the ballots must be returned to the ballot box and resealed in the presence of the
county board of elections or its designee and public witnesses;
(f) The county board of elections or its designee shall compare the signed register tape total from the vote
tabulation machine on election day to the hand-to-eye tallies. If there is a discrepancy between the
machine count and the hand-to-eye audit, other than instances of voter intent markings outside the
designated marking area on the paper ballot that were unreadable by the scanner, or unscanned
overvotes resulting from two (2) or more voter intent marks on the same race, the county board of
elections or its designee shall open an election investigation including a review of election day
irregularity reports. If more discrepancies are found, the county board of elections or its designee shall
broaden the investigation until the reason for the discrepancy is discovered and subsequently resolved.
A determination as to whether the outcome of the race could have been impacted by the discrepancies
shall be made and any findings shall be reported to the Attorney General and Secretary of State; and
(g) The county board of elections or its designee shall examine the electronic or paper sign-in records from
the precinct or vote center and validate that the ballots cast and recounted were less than or equal to the
sign-in records for that precinct or vote center. If the cast ballots for the precinct or vote center exceed
the number of voters on the sign-in records for the precinct or vote center, the county board of elections
shall open an election investigation and report the findings to the Attorney General and Secretary of
State;
(9) Provide a method for maintaining sufficient documents, including ballots and records, so that votes can be
recounted;
(10) Ensure the county board of elections produces accurate precinct-by-precinct summaries of tabulation sheets
showing the results of each precinct during in-person absentee voting, election day voting, and when a county
is approved to use a vote center;
(11) Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to specified elections be retained
for twenty-two (22) months, such documents and records shall be maintained for thirty (30) days following an
election; and
(12) Unless contrary to the Help America Vote Act of 2002, ensure that all federal provisional voting shall be
conducted in a manner as prescribed by KRS Chapters 116 to 120.
Section 35. KRS 118.176 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "bona fide" candidate means one who is seeking nomination in a primary or election in a special or regular
election according to law.
(2) The bona fides of any candidate seeking nomination as the nominee of a political party or a nonpartisan or
judicial nominee in a primary or election to an office as a member of a political organization, political group,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
or as an independent in a special or regular election may be questioned by any qualified voter entitled to vote
for the candidate or by an opposing candidate by summary proceedings consisting of a motion before the
Circuit Court of the judicial circuit in which the candidate whose bona fides is questioned resides. An action
regarding the bona fides of the nominee of a political party or a nonpartisan or judicial nominee may be
commenced at any time prior to the primary. An action regarding the bona fides for election to an office as a
member of a political organization, political group, or as an independent may be commenced at any time prior
to a special or regular election. The motion shall be tried summarily and without delay. Proof may be heard
orally, and upon motion of either party shall be officially reported. If the Circuit Judge of the circuit in which
the proceeding is filed is disqualified or absent from the county or is herself or himself a candidate, the
proceeding may be presented to, heard and determined by the Circuit Judge of any adjoining judicial circuit.
(3) In any action or proceeding under this section the burden of proof as to the bona fides of a candidate shall be
on the person challenging the bona fides of a candidate.
(4) If the court finds the candidate is not a bona fide candidate:
(a) It shall so order, and certify the fact to the board of elections, and the candidate's name shall be stricken
from the written designation of election officers filed with the board of elections or the court may refuse
recognition or relief in a mandatory or injunctive way;[.]
(b) The order of the Circuit Court shall be entered on the order book of the court and shall be subject to a
motion to set aside in the Court of Appeals. The motion shall be heard by the Court of Appeals or a
judge thereof in the manner provided for dissolving or granting injunctions, except that the motion shall
be made before the court or judge within five (5) days after the entry of the order in the Circuit Court,
and may be heard and tried upon the original papers, and the order of the Court of Appeals or judge
thereof shall be final; and
(c) The person bringing the action shall be entitled to and awarded his or her reasonable attorney's fees,
expert witness fees, and other court costs for trial and appeal, and those fees and costs shall be taxed
against the candidate or his or her campaign committee after the timely filing of a bill of costs with
the Circuit Court.
(5) No person shall approach the Circuit Judge for the purpose or view of influencing his or her decision on the
motion pending before the Circuit Judge or to be tried by him or her.
SECTION 36. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 118A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A candidate for judicial office may publicly disclose his or her political party affiliation, including but not
limited to:
(a) Identifying himself or herself as a member of a political party;
(b) Stating current voter registration status or past or current party affiliation; and
(c) Communicating political values or viewpoints consistent with his or her party affiliation.
(2) A candidate for judicial office shall not:
(a) Claim to be the official nominee of a political party for judicial office;
(b) Use language or materials that imply nomination, designation, or endorsement by a political party;
or
(c) Use party symbols, slogans, or imagery in a manner that would mislead a reasonable person to
believe the candidate is running in a partisan election or was selected by a political party to represent
it.
(3) This section shall not be construed to authorize partisan elections for judicial office or to permit political
party nomination, designation, or ballot labeling of candidates for judicial office.
Section 37. KRS 120.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A contest instituted under KRS 120.155 shall proceed as equity actions. Upon return of the summons properly
executed to the office of the circuit clerk, he or she shall immediately docket the case and notify the presiding
judge of the court that the contest has been filed. The judge shall proceed to a trial of the cause without delay.
In courts having more than one (1) judge, the judge who shall try the case shall be determined by lot. The court
shall complete the case as soon as practicable. The action shall have precedence over all other cases.

CHAPTER 175 29
(2) The evidence in chief for the contestant shall be completed within thirty (30) days after service of summons;
the evidence for the contestee shall be completed within twenty-five (25) days after filing of answer, and
evidence for contestant in rebuttal shall be completed within seven (7) days after the contestee has concluded;
provided that for cause the court may grant a reasonable extension of time to either party.
(3) All voting machines, voting equipment, or voting systems, ballots, stub books, and other papers concerning
which there is any ground for contest may be removed to the court in which the action is pending.
(4) If it appears from an inspection of the whole record that there has been such fraud, intimidation, bribery, or
violence in the conduct of the election that neither contestant nor contestee can be judged to have been fairly
elected, the Circuit Court, or an appellate court[,] on appeal, may adjudge that there has been no election. In
that event the office shall be deemed vacant, with the same legal effect as if the person elected had refused to
qualify. In the event a majority of the offices of a legislative body are deemed vacant under subsection (5)(b)
of Section 29 of this Act, the county clerk and local board of elections shall call a special election of the
bona fide candidates who previously qualified as soon as practicable, within at least forty-five (45) days of
the declaration of vacancies becoming final orders. If one (1) of the parties is adjudged by the court to be
elected to the office, he or she shall, on production of a copy of the final judgment, be permitted to qualify or
be commissioned.
(5) If an election contest brought under this section is successful, as determined by the Circuit Court or an
appellate court on appeal, the contestant shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees, expert
witness fees, and other court costs. The fees and costs shall be taxed by the court against the local board of
elections or against any party adjudicated to have engaged in fraud, intimidation, bribery, or violence that
prevented either the contestant or contestee from being fairly elected.
Section 38. KRS 121.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Registry" means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;
(2) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies regardless of whether a candidate or
slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be
considered a separate election;
(3) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make
expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for
nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office, that is authorized by the candidate or
slate of candidates to receive contributions, make expenditures, and generally conduct a campaign for
the candidate or slate of candidates, but does not include an entity established solely by a candidate
which is managed solely by a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature,
such as "Friends of (the candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons have structured themselves
as a committee, designated officers of the committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each
officer with the purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an election;
(b) "Independent expenditure-only committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
unlimited contributions for the purpose of making only independent expenditures to support or oppose
one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state,
county, city, or district office;
(c) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of one (1) of the following caucus groups who
receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or
slates of candidates for nomination or election, or a committee:
1. House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party, which serve the same
function as the above-named committees, as determined by regulations promulgated by the
registry;
(d) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining together to advocate or
oppose a ballot measure if that committee receives or expends money in excess of one thousand dollars
($1,000);
(e) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an association, committee, or
organization, other than a campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee, federally
registered political committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign
committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended to be, a permanent
organization having as a primary purpose expressly advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more
clearly identified candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a regular basis
throughout the year;
(f) [An ]"Executive committee of a political party," which means a political committee that is a
subdivision of a national political party committee and operates within the structure and under the
supervision of the state executive committee of that same political party. Political parties may support
candidates for public office, raise and spend money for their internal operations, and are governed
by a committee that is elected by the voters in that subdivision in a manner not inconsistent with the
rules of that same political party; and
(g) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make
expenditures in support of inauguration activities for any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any
state, county, city, or district office;
(4) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates, slates of candidates,
campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or executive committees from time to time from funds
derived solely from within the group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the
group itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred
dollars ($100)] shall be reported to the registry;
(5) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is or was a candidate for
nomination or election to a political office in this state designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable,
religious, or educational;
(6) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value, to a candidate, his or her
agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a committee, or contributing organization. As used in
this subsection, "loan" shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the risk
of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as with a committee, contributing
organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as
surety, endorser, or guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all other
contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its agent, a
committee, or a contributing organization, exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its
authorized treasurer, a committee, or a contributing organization, of compensation for the personal
services of another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or
contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred
dollars ($100)] in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a candidate, slate of
candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for inauguration activities without charge, or at a
rate which is less than the rate normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its
authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing organization for any goods or services with a value of
more than two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] in the aggregate in any one (1)
election which are utilized by a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization,
or for inauguration activities;
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of "contribution," the word shall not be construed to include:

CHAPTER 175 31
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on
behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization;
(b) A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky made in accordance with
applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of business;[ or]
(c) An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee; or
(d) Any processing fee, transaction fee, or service charge deducted by a third-party payment processor,
credit card issuer, or electronic payment service, provided that the fee is a standard commercial
charge for the service rendered;
(8) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made expenditures, has appointed a
campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent for any other person to receive contributions or make
expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to a nonfederal public office,
except as provided in KRS 121.180(10)(b);
(9) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a candidate for the office of
Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the candidate designates a running mate for the office of
Lieutenant Governor under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the office
of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that same slate of candidates
consists of that same candidate for the office of Governor and the candidate's running mate for the
office of Lieutenant Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;
(10) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense,
that a person is aware or should have been aware that his or her conduct is of that nature or that the
circumstance exists;
(11) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on behalf of a candidate or
slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess
of two hundred thousand (200,000) residents;
(12) "Independent expenditure" means:
(a) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which expressly advocates the
election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or slate of candidates, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate, slate of candidates,
campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them; or
(b) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which expressly advocates or
opposes a ballot measure, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any political issues
committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of a political issues committee; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any political issues committee, or
any authorized person acting on behalf of a political issues committee;
(13) "Electronic reporting" means the use of technology, having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits
campaign finance reports to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the
reports;
(14) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature,
record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an
electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying
words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(15) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a
record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record;
(16) "Filer" means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or entity required to submit
financial disclosure reports to the registry;
(17) "Filer-side software" means software provided to or used by the filer that enables transmittal of financial
reports to the registry;
(18) "Form" means an online web page or an electronic document designed to capture, validate, and submit data for
processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise prescribes;
(19) "Reasonable cause" means an event, happening, or circumstance entirely beyond the knowledge or control of
the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, which has exercised due care and prudence in maintaining the
records of the campaign or committee pursuant to statute or administrative regulation;
(20) "Foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States;
(b) A government, political subdivision, or municipality of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a
foreign country; or
(e) Any entity in the United States, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation, or
organization that is wholly or majority owned by any foreign national, unless:
1. Any contribution or expenditure the entity makes derives entirely from funds generated by the
entity's United States operations; and
2. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure, except for setting overall budget
amounts, are made by individuals who are United States citizens or permanent residents;
(21) "Ballot measure" means a question, other than the nomination or election of a candidate for public office,
which has been:
(a) Approved by a political subdivision or the General Assembly and is required by law to be placed before
the voters of the territory affected; or
(b) Initiated or referred by citizen petition as authorized by KRS 242.020 and placed before the voters of
the territory affected;
(22) "Preliminary activity" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Participating in focus groups;
(b) Making telephone calls;
(c) Traveling;
(d) Conducting polls; and
(e) Drafting ballot measure language; and
(23) "Tax-exempt organization" means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c) and exempt from federal
taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(a). This subsection shall not be construed to treat a political organization
under 26 U.S.C. sec. 527 as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of this chapter.
Section 39. KRS 121.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No publisher of newspapers, magazines, handbills, or other printed matter, owner or lessor of billboards, radio
or television station or network, digital media platform, or any other person, company, corporation, or
organization offering its communications services for hire to the public shall be permitted to charge fees for
political advertising in excess of the lowest rate charged to other advertisers at the time the political
advertising is purchased.
(2) Political advertising means any communication intended to support or defeat a candidate for public office.

CHAPTER 175 33
(3) An action to enjoin violations of this section shall be in the Circuit Court of the county where the complaining
candidate resides.
Section 40. KRS 121.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created as an independent agency of state government a Kentucky Registry of Election
Finance. The registry shall be composed of seven (7) members appointed as provided herein. The registry shall
remain independent of any other agency or department of state government. Members shall be at least twenty-
five (25) years of age, registered voters in Kentucky, not announced candidates for public office, not officers
of a political party's state central executive committee, shall not have been convicted of an election offense,
and shall be persons of high ethical standards who have an active interest in promoting fair elections.
Appointees shall be subject to Senate confirmation at the next regular session of the General Assembly
following appointment, or at the next special session if included in the Governor's call. Appointees shall have
full power to serve until any vote of nonconfirmation.
(2) Members of the registry shall be selected as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the
state central committee of the political party polling the largest vote at the last gubernatorial election;[.]
(b) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the
state central committee of the political party polling the second largest vote at the last gubernatorial
election. The members appointed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall take office on
August 15, 1990, for a term of one (1) year and their successors shall serve a term of four (4) years
beginning August 15, 1991, or until their successors are appointed and qualified;[.]
(c) Two (2) other members shall be appointed by the Governor. Before making these appointments, the
Governor shall solicit nominations from at least two (2) organizations which have demonstrated a
nonpartisan interest in fair elections and informed voting. The Governor's solicitations and the replies
shall be public records. The Governor shall give due consideration to such nominations. The two (2)
members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be one (1) from each of the two (2) political parties
which polled the greatest number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. Members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1988, for a term of four (4) years or until
their successors are appointed and qualified and their successors shall serve a term of four (4) years;[.]
(d) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts after soliciting nominations as
provided by subsection (c) of this section. The appointee shall be a member of one (1) of the two (2)
political parties which polled the greatest number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. The
member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1997, for a term of four
(4) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four
(4) years;[.]
(e) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Attorney General after soliciting nominations as provided by
subsection (c) of this section. The appointee shall not be a member of the same political party as the
person appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. The
member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1990, for a term of four
(4) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four
(4) years; and[.]
(f) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Secretary of State after soliciting nominations as provided by
subsection (c) of this section. The Secretary of State's appointment shall be without regard to political
affiliation. The member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1990, for a
term of three (3) years or until his successor is appointed and qualified and his successors shall serve a
term of four (4) years.
(3) The members of the registry shall select a chairman from among the appointed membership, effective August
15, 1990. The chairman shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The
chairman shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.
(4) In the event of a vacancy in the office of any member, the vacancy shall be filled within thirty (30) days of the
occurrence, in the same manner as the vacating member's office was filled pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

34 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) The registry shall fix the place and time of its regular meetings by order duly recorded in its minutes. No
action shall be taken without a quorum present. Special meetings shall be called by the chairman on his own
initiative or on the written request of three (3) members. Members shall receive seven (7) days' written notice
of a special meeting and the notice shall specify the purpose, time and place of the meeting, and no other
matters may be considered, without a specific waiver by all the members.
(6) The members of the registry[ shall receive sixty-five dollars ($65) per diem, and] shall be reimbursed for
necessary travel and expenses in the same manner as state employees[all reasonable and necessary
expenses].
Section 41. KRS 121.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The registry may:
(a) Require by special or general orders, any person to submit, under oath, any written reports and answers
to questions as the registry may prescribe;
(b) Administer oaths or affirmations;
(c) Require by subpoena, signed by the chair, the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production
of all documentary evidence, excluding individual and business income tax records, relating to the
execution of its duties;
(d) In any proceeding or investigation, to order testimony to be taken by deposition before any person who
is designated by the registry and has the power to administer oaths and, in those instances, to compel
testimony and the production of evidence in the same manner as authorized under paragraph (c) of this
subsection;
(e) Initiate, through civil actions for injunctive, declaratory, or other appropriate relief, defend, or appeal
any civil action in the name of the registry to enforce the provisions of this chapter through its legal
counsel;
(f) Render advisory opinions under KRS 121.135;
(g) Promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
(h) Conduct investigations and hearings expeditiously, to encourage voluntary compliance, and report
apparent campaign finance law violations to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;
(i) Petition any court of competent jurisdiction to issue an order requiring compliance with an order or
subpoena issued by the registry. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court
as contempt; and
(j) Conduct random audits of receipts and expenditures of committees which have filed registration papers
with the registry pursuant to KRS 121.170.
(2) No person shall be subject to civil liability to any person other than the registry or the Commonwealth for
disclosing information at the request of the registry.
(3) The registry may appoint a full-time executive director, legal counsel, and an accountant for auditing purposes,
all of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the registry. The registry may also appoint such other employees as
are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All requests for personnel appointments shall be
forwarded by the registry directly to the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet and shall be subject to the
secretary's review and certification only.
(4) The registry shall adopt official forms and perform other duties necessary to implement the provisions of this
chapter. The registry shall not require the listing of a person's Social Security number on any form developed
by the registry. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the registry shall:
(a) Develop prescribed forms for the making of the required reports;
(b) Prepare and publish a manual for all candidates, slates of candidates, contributing organizations, and
committees, describing the requirements of the law, including uniform methods of bookkeeping and
reporting, requirements as to reporting dates, and the length of time that candidates, slates of candidates,
contributing organizations, and committees are required to keep any records pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter;
(c) Develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system;

CHAPTER 175 35
(d) Make each report filed available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at the
expense of any person requesting copies of them;
(e) Preserve all reports for at least six (6) years from the date of receipt. Duly certified reports shall be
admissible as evidence in any court in the Commonwealth;
(f) Prepare and make available for public inspection a summary of all reports grouped according to
candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing organizations, and parties containing the total
receipts and expenditures; and
1. For each contribution made by a permanent committee of any amount to a candidate or slate of
candidates, the date, name, and business address of the permanent committee, the amount
contributed, and a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by
the permanent committee; and
2. For each contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] made
to any candidate or campaign committee, the date, name, address, occupation, and employer of
each other contributor or, if the contributor is self-employed, the name under which the
contributor is doing business, and the amount contributed by each contributor, listed
alphabetically;
(g) Prepare and publish an annual report with cumulative compilations named in paragraph (f) of this
subsection;
(h) Distribute upon request, for a nominal fee, copies of all summaries and reports;
(i) Determine whether the required reports have been filed and if so, whether they conform with the
requirements of this chapter; give notice to delinquents to correct or explain defections; issue an order,
if appropriate, as provided in KRS 121.140; and make public the fact that a violation has occurred and
the nature thereof;
(j) Conduct random audits of receipts and expenditures of candidates running for city, county, urban-
county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, and district offices. When the registry audits the records of any selected candidate, it shall
also audit the records of all other candidates running for the same office in the selected city, county,
urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, or district office;
(k) Conduct audits of receipts and expenditures of all candidates or slates of candidates running for
statewide office;
(l) Require that candidates and slates of candidates shall maintain their records for a period of six (6) years
from the date of the regular election in their respective political races;
(m) Initiate investigations and make investigations with respect to reports upon complaint by any person
and initiate proceedings on its own motion; and
(n) Forward to the Attorney General or the appropriate Commonwealth's or county attorney any violations
of this chapter which may become the subject of civil or criminal prosecution.
(5) All policy and enforcement decisions concerning the regulation of campaign finance shall be the ultimate
responsibility of the registry. No appointed or elected state officeholder or any other person shall, directly or
indirectly, attempt to secure or create privileges, exemptions, or advantages for himself, herself, or others in
derogation of the public interest at large in a manner that seeks to leave any registry member or employee
charged with the enforcement of the campaign finance laws no alternative but to comply with the wishes of the
officeholder or person. Registry members and employees shall be free of obligation or the appearance of
obligation to any interest other than the fair and efficient enforcement of the campaign finance laws and
administrative regulations. It shall not be considered a violation of this subsection for an officeholder or other
person to seek remedies in a court of law to any policy or enforcement decision he or she considers to be an
abridgement of his or her legal rights.
(6) If adequate and appropriate agency funds are available, the registry shall:
(a) Develop or acquire a system for electronic reporting for use by individuals and entities required to file
campaign finance reports with the registry under this chapter. The registry shall promulgate
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

36 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
administrative regulations in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A which provide for a
nonproprietary standardized format or formats, using industry standards, for the transmission of data
required under this chapter;
(b) Accept test files from software vendors and persons wishing to file reports electronically for the
purpose of determining whether the file format complies with the nonproprietary standardized format
developed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and is compatible with the registry's system for
receiving the data;
(c) Make all reports filed with the registry pertaining to candidates for the General Assembly and statewide
office available on the internet free of charge, in an easily understood format that allows the public to
browse, search, and download the data contained in the reports by each of the reporting categories
required by this chapter, including but not limited to:
1. The name of each candidate or committee;
2. The office sought by each candidate;
3. The name of each contributor;
4. The address of each contributor;
5. The employer or business occupation of each contributor, or if the contributor is a permanent
committee, a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the
permanent committee;
6. The date of each contribution; and
7. The amount of each contribution;
(d) Make all data specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection available on the Internet no later than ten
(10) business days after its receipt by the registry. If a contribution or expenditure report is filed late
with the registry, that data shall be made available on the internet within twenty-four (24) hours of the
registry's receipt of the data;
(e) Make filer-side software available free of charge to all individuals or entities subject to the reporting
requirements of this chapter;
(f) Establish a training program on the electronic reporting program and make it available free of charge to
all individuals and entities subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter;
(g) Maintain all campaign finance data pertaining to legislative and statewide candidates online[on-line]
for twenty (20) years after the date the report containing the data is filed, and then archive the data in a
secure format;
(h) Require candidates and slates of candidates running for statewide office, and campaign committees of
candidates and slates of candidates registered to run for statewide office, beginning with elections
scheduled in 2015, to electronically report all campaign finance reports that must be submitted to the
registry under this chapter. If any statewide candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee of a
statewide candidate or slate of candidates submits a campaign finance report in a nonelectronic format
for an election scheduled in 2015 or later, the registry shall require the statewide candidate, slate of
candidates, or campaign committee of the statewide candidate or slate of candidates to resubmit the
campaign finance report in an electronic format;
(i) Require all candidates, slates of candidates, committees, and contributing organizations, beginning with
the primary scheduled in 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled thereafter, to electronically
report all campaign finance reports required to be submitted to the registry under this chapter. If any
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization submits a campaign finance
report to the registry in a nonelectronic format for an election or calendar period beginning in 2020 or
later, the registry shall require the candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing
organization to resubmit the campaign finance report in an electronic format. If any candidate, slate of
candidates, committee, or contributing organization does not submit the required campaign finance
reports electronically by the applicable filing deadline, the registry shall publish the candidate, slate of
candidates, committee, or contributing organization's name as a delinquent filer until such time as the
campaign finance report is properly filed in an electronic format; and

CHAPTER 175 37
(j) Require all independent expenditure reports to be submitted electronically within forty-eight (48) hours
of the date that the communication is publicly distributed or otherwise publicly disseminated, beginning
with the primary scheduled in 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled thereafter.
(7) In conjunction with the program of electronic reporting set out in subsection (6) of this section, the registry
shall deem an electronic report to be filed when submitted by either of the following methods:
(a) Online Internet transmission; or
(b) Hand delivery of the electronic report, saved on a current and compatible computer component, and
downloaded at the registry.
Section 42. KRS 121.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the sworn complaint of any person, or on its own initiative, the registry shall investigate alleged
violations of campaign finance law. In conducting any investigation, the registry shall have the power of
subpoena and may compel production of evidence including the financial records of any person determined by
the registry to be vital to the investigation. The records subject to subpoena include, but are not limited to, a
person's bank records and other relevant documents, but excluding individual and business income tax records.
(2) If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the law has been violated, the registry shall
notify the alleged violator of its conclusions and the evidence supporting them, and shall offer the alleged
violator a conciliation agreement to resolve the issue. A conciliation agreement may require the alleged
violator to comply with one (1) or more of the following:
(a) To cease and desist violations of the law;
(b) To file required reports or other documents or information;
(c) To pay a penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) a day, up to a maximum total fine of five
thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any report, payment of an administrative fee, or other
document or information required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is
filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for statewide office; or
(d) To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for acts of noncompliance
with provisions contained within this chapter.
(3) A monetary penalty under subsection (2) of this section for failure to file any report, payment of an
administrative fee, or other documentation or information required by law shall not begin to accrue or be
assessed until five (5) business days after the registry has provided notice of the delinquency to the
candidate or the campaign treasurer. If the violation is corrected within the five (5) business days following
the registry's notice, no penalty shall be assessed.
(4) To accept a conciliation agreement, an alleged violator shall deliver the signed agreement to the registry either
in person or by mail postmarked not later than ten (10) days after the day he received it. The registry may
institute a civil action in Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court for the county of the violator's residence to
enforce the provisions of any conciliation agreement accepted by a violator who is not complying with its
provisions.
(5)[(4)] If the alleged violator declines to accept the conciliation agreement or fails to respond within the time
allowed, the registry shall conduct an administrative hearing. The provisions of KRS Chapter 13B shall apply
to all registry administrative hearings except for the provisions of KRS 13B.030(2)(b). A party adversely
affected by the registry's final order may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after the date
of the registry's final order. The violator may be ordered to comply with any one (1) or more of the following
requirements:
(a) To cease and desist violation of this law;
(b) To file any reports or other documents or information required by this law;
(c) To pay a penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) a day, up to a maximum total fine of five
thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any report, payment of an administrative fee, or other
document or information required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is
filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for statewide office; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

38 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for acts of noncompliance
with provisions contained within this chapter. An appeal of an order shall be advanced on the docket to
permit a timely decision.
(6)[(5)] If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the campaign finance law has been
violated knowingly, it shall refer the violation to the Attorney General or the appropriate Commonwealth's or
county attorney for prosecution. The Attorney General may request the registry's attorney or the appropriate
county or Commonwealth's attorney to prosecute the matter and may request from the registry all evidence
collected in its investigation. In the event the Attorney General or the appropriate local prosecutor fails to
prosecute in a timely fashion, the registry may petition the Circuit Court to appoint the registry's attorney to
prosecute, and upon a motion timely filed, for good cause shown, the court shall enter an order to that effect.
Prosecutions involving campaign finance law violations, in which the reports are required to be filed in
Frankfort, may be conducted in Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court for the county in which the
contribution or expenditure constituting a campaign finance violation was solicited, made, or accepted. The
prosecution of a person who unlawfully solicits, makes, or accepts a contribution or expenditure through the
use of the mail may be conducted in the Circuit Court for the county in which the solicitation is mailed, the
county in which the contribution is mailed or received, or the county in which the expenditure is mailed.
(7)[(6)] If judicial review is sought of any action of the registry relating to a pending election, the matter shall
be advanced on the docket of the court. The court may take any steps authorized by law to accelerate its
procedures so as to permit a timely decision.
Section 43. KRS 121.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No contribution shall be made or received, directly or indirectly, other than an independent expenditure, to
support inauguration activities or to support or defeat a candidate, slate of candidates, constitutional
amendment, or public question which will appear on the ballot in an election, except through the duly
appointed campaign manager, or campaign treasurer of the candidate, slate of candidates, or registered
committee. Any person making an independent expenditure, shall report these expenditures when the
expenditures by that person exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate in any one (1) election, on a
form provided or using a format approved by the registry and shall sign a statement on the form, under penalty
of perjury, that the expenditure was an actual independent expenditure and that there was no prior
communication with the campaign on whose behalf it was made.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 121.180(10), the solicitation from and contributions by campaign committees,
independent expenditure-only committees, caucus campaign committees, political issues committees,
permanent committees, and party executive committees to any religious, charitable, civic, eleemosynary, or
other causes or organizations established primarily for the public good is expressly prohibited; except that it
shall not be construed as a violation of this section for:
(a) A candidate or a slate of candidates to contribute to religious, civic, or charitable groups; or
(b) A state or county executive committee of a political party to contribute up to one hundred dollars
($100) per year to a nonprofit civic organization if the organization promotes civic education, voter
registration efforts, or patriotic events.
(3) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone acting on their behalf,
shall accept any anonymous contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars
($100)], and all anonymous contributions in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars
($100)] shall be returned to the donor, if the donor can be determined. If no donor is found, the contribution
shall escheat to the state. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor
anyone acting on their behalf shall accept anonymous contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
in the aggregate in any one (1) election. Anonymous contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
in the aggregate which are received in any one (1) election shall escheat to the state.
(4) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall
accept a cash contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] in the
aggregate from each contributor in any one (1) election. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or
contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall accept a cashier's check or money order in excess
of the maximum cash contribution limit unless the instrument clearly identifies both the payor and the payee.
A contribution made by cashier's check or money order which identifies both the payor and payee shall be
treated as a contribution made by check for purposes of the contribution limits contained in this section. No
person shall make a cash contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] in

CHAPTER 175 39
the aggregate in any one (1) election to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing
organization, nor anyone on their behalf.
(5) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall
accept any contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] from any person
who shall not become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day of the next general election.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (22) of this section, no candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee,
nor anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept a contribution in an amount that is greater than the
contribution limit applicable to federal candidates and principal campaign committees established by 52
U.S.C. sec. 30116(a)(1)(A), as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year by the Federal Election
Commission pursuant to 52 U.S.C. sec. 30116(c)[of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for
inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted
annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that
year as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars],
from any person, permanent committee, or contributing organization in any one (1) election. No person,
permanent committee, or contributing organization shall contribute an amount that is greater than the
contribution limit applicable to federal candidates and principal campaign committees established by 52
U.S.C. sec. 30116(a)(1)(A), as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year by the Federal Election
Commission pursuant to 52 U.S.C. sec. 30116(c)[more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for
inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted
annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, as
published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars], to any
one (1) candidate, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, in any one (1) election.
(7) Permanent committees or contributing organizations affiliated by bylaw structure or by registration, as
determined by the Registry of Election Finance, shall be considered as one (1) committee for purposes of
applying the contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.
(8) No permanent committee shall contribute funds to another permanent committee for the purpose of
circumventing contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section. A permanent committee or independent
expenditure-only committee may make unlimited contributions to an independent expenditure-only committee,
or as allowed by federal law to a federally registered political committee, provided that if a contribution is
earmarked for a particular independent expenditure, the person making the independent expenditure shall
disclose the contribution when reporting the independent expenditure pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(9) No person shall contribute funds to a permanent committee, political issues committee, or contributing
organization for the purpose of circumventing the contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.
(10) No person shall contribute an amount that is greater than the contribution limit applicable to federal
candidates and principal campaign committees established by 52 U.S.C. sec. 30116(a)(1)(A), as indexed for
inflation every odd-numbered year by the Federal Election Commission pursuant to 52 U.S.C. sec.
30116(c)[more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year using the
preceding year's percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all
Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars], to a permanent committee or
contributing organization in any one (1) year.
(11) (a) No person shall contribute more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000)[five thousand dollars ($5,000)] to
the state executive committee of a political party in any one (1) year. The contribution limit in this
paragraph shall not apply to a contribution designated exclusively for a state executive committee's
building fund account established under KRS 121.172.
(b) No person shall contribute more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000)[five thousand dollars ($5,000)] to
a subdivision or affiliate of a state political party in any one (1) year.
(c) No person shall contribute more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000)[five thousand dollars ($5,000)] to
a caucus campaign committee in any one (1) year.
(12) No person shall make a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money to another person to
contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, or anyone on their
behalf. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf
shall accept a contribution made by one (1) person who has received a payment, distribution, loan, advance,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

40 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
deposit, or gift of money from another person to contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee,
contributing organization, or anyone on their behalf.
(13) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for nomination
to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall
solicit or accept contributions for primary election expenses after the date of the primary. No person other than
the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for primary election expenses after the date of the primary.
(14) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for any state,
county, city, or district office at a regular election, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf,
shall solicit or accept contributions for regular election expenses after the date of the regular election. No
person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for regular election expenses after the
date of the regular election.
(15) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for nomination
or election to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their
behalf, shall solicit or accept contributions for special election expenses after the date of the special election.
No person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for special election expenses after the
date of the special election.
(16) The provisions of subsections (13) and (14) of this section shall apply only to those candidates in a primary or
regular election which shall be conducted subsequent to January 1, 1989. The provisions of subsection (15) of
this section shall apply only to those candidates or slates of candidates in a special election which shall be
conducted subsequent to January 1, 1993.
(17) A candidate, slate of candidates, or a campaign committee may solicit and accept contributions after the date
of a primary election, regular election, or special election to defray necessary expenses that arise after the date
of the election associated with election contests, recounts, and recanvasses of a specific election, complaints
regarding alleged campaign finance violations that are filed with the registry pertaining to a specific election,
or other legal actions pertaining to a specific election to which a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign
committee is a party, and for repayment of debts and obligations owed by the campaign or previous campaign
for the same office. Reports of contributions received and expenditures made after the date of the specific
election shall be made in accordance with KRS 121.180.
(18) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, except a political issues committee, independent expenditure-
only committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall knowingly accept a
contribution from a corporation, directly or indirectly, except to the extent that the contribution is designated to
a state executive committee's building fund account established under KRS 121.172.
(19) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability of a corporation to administer its permanent
committee insofar as its actions can be deemed not to influence an election as prohibited by KRS 121.025.
(20) No candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit a contribution of
money or services from a state employee, whether or not the employee is covered by the classified service
provisions of KRS Chapter 18A. However, it shall not be a violation of this subsection for a state employee to
receive a solicitation directed to him as a registered voter in an identified precinct as part of an overall plan to
contact voters not identified as state employees.
(21) No candidate or slate of candidates for any office in this state shall accept a contribution, including an in-kind
contribution, which is made from funds in a federal campaign account. No person shall make a contribution,
including an in-kind contribution, from funds in a federal campaign account to any candidate or slate of
candidates for any office in this state. However, it shall not be a violation of this subsection for a federal
candidate to contribute to a party executive committee if the amount of the contribution does not exceed the
contribution limit contained in subsection (11) of this section and the contribution is not earmarked for a
particular candidate or slate of candidates.
(22) It shall be permissible for a married couple to make a contribution with one (1) check that reflects the
combined individual contribution limits of each individual spouse per election, as set forth in subsection (6) of
this section, for all elections in a calendar year and the following shall be required to be written on the check:
(a) The signatures of both spouses on the signature line of the check; and
(b) The designation of each contribution amount and the election or elections to which they apply shall be
memorialized on the memo line of the check.

CHAPTER 175 41
(23) This section and any other provision of this chapter shall not be construed to prohibit a qualified political
party committee, including a state or county executive committee, from endorsing, supporting, opposing, or
making otherwise lawful contributions or expenditures supporting or opposing a candidacy designated as
nonpartisan under state law. The endorsement, support, or opposition by a political party committee shall
not affect the nonpartisan status of the office or the candidate.
Section 44. KRS 121.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each candidate or slate of candidates shall, on a form prescribed and furnished by the registry, designate a
campaign treasurer to act as their agent at the time they file as a candidate or slate of candidates, and until this
requirement is met, the candidate or slate of candidates shall be listed on the form as their own treasurer and
accountable as such. The candidate or slate of candidates may appoint themselves or any registered voter in
Kentucky as the campaign treasurer. The office with which the candidate or slate of candidates is required to
file shall immediately forward to the registry a copy of the candidate's or slate's filing papers. The office with
which the candidate or slate of candidates files shall promptly notify the registry when a candidate withdraws.
(2) The duties of a campaign treasurer shall be to:
(a) Designate a depository bank in which the primary campaign account shall be maintained and deposit all
contributions in that account;
(b) Keep detailed and exact accounts of:
1. Contributions of any amount made by a permanent committee, by name and business address of
the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description
of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee; and
2. Contributions in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] made to any
candidate, by name, address, age if under legal voting age, date of the contribution, amount of
the contribution, and the employer and occupation of each other contributor. If the contributor is
self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed. The occupation
listed for the contributor shall be specific. A general classification, such as "businessman," shall
be insufficient;
(c) Make or authorize all expenditures on behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates. Any expenditure in
excess of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be by check and the treasurer's records shall disclose the name,
address, and occupation of every person or firm to whom made, and shall list the date and amount of the
expenditure and the treasurer shall keep a receipted bill for each;
(d) Maintain all receipted bills and accounts required by this section for a period of six (6) years from the
date he files his last report under KRS 121.180(3)(b)1.; and
(e) Make no payment to any person not directly providing goods or services with the intent to conceal
payment to another.
(3) A candidate or slate of candidates may remove a campaign treasurer at any time.
(4) In case of the death, resignation, or removal of a campaign treasurer, the candidate or slate of candidates shall
within three (3) days after receiving notice thereof by certified mail, appoint a successor and shall file his
name and address with the registry. The candidate, or slate shall be accountable as their own campaign
treasurer if they fail to meet this filing requirement.
(5) A person may serve as campaign treasurer for more than one (1) candidate or slate of candidates, but all
reports shall be made separately for each individual candidate or slate.
(6) The candidate or slate of candidates may pay a campaign treasurer a salary for his services which shall be
considered a campaign expense and shall comply with the reporting provisions of KRS 121.180 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the registry.
Section 45. KRS 121.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Persons becoming a candidate as defined in KRS 121.015(8) or slate of candidates as defined in
KRS 121.015(9), or a political issues committee as defined in KRS 121.015(3)(d), shall submit a
form prescribed and furnished by the registry indicating whether they intend to raise or spend in
excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, or that contributions will not be
accepted or expended in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

42 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Candidates and slates of candidates shall submit this form to the registry within five (5) days of
receiving contributions or making expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her
nomination or election to public office, or within five (5) days of filing papers to run for public
office, whichever is sooner. Candidates and slates of candidates who advance to a regular
election following a primary shall submit this form to the registry within five (5) days after the
date of the primary. Political issues committees shall submit the form to the registry within five
(5) days of meeting the definition of political issues committee in KRS 121.015(3)(d).
2. Each candidate, slate of candidates, or political issues committee indicating that contributions
will not be accepted or expended in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1)
election shall be exempt from filing any campaign finance reports required by subsection (3) of
this section.
3. A separate form shall be required for each primary, regular, or special election in which the
candidate or slate of candidates participates or in which the public question appears on the ballot.
The form shall be submitted by means of electronic filing with the registry.
4. Any person acting as a candidate or slate of candidates by receiving contributions or making
expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, or
filing papers to run for public office, or group of persons acting as a political issues committee,
who fails to file this form as required, or who fails to remedy a deficiency within five (5) days,
may be fined by the registry an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per day, up to a
maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(b) For a primary, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file a request for exemption not later than the
deadline described in paragraph (a) of this subsection for filing nomination papers and, except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its terms unless it is
rescinded in writing not later than thirty (30) days preceding the primary. For a regular election, a
candidate or slate of candidates shall file or rescind in writing a request for exemption not later than
sixty (60) days preceding the regular election, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of
this subsection. For a special election, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file a request for
exemption not later than ten (10) days after the candidate or slate of candidates is nominated for a
special election and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later than thirty (30)
days preceding the special election. A political issues committee chair shall file a request for exemption
when the committee registers with the registry and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in
writing not later than thirty (30) days preceding the date the issue appears on the ballot.
(c) 1. A candidate or slate of candidates that revokes a request for exemption in a timely manner shall
file all reports required of a candidate intending to raise or spend in excess of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) in an election. To revoke the request for an exemption, the candidate or slate of
candidates shall file the appropriate form with the registry not later than the deadline for filing a
revocation.
2. A candidate or slate of candidates that is exempted from campaign finance reporting
requirements pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection but who accepts contributions or makes
expenditures in excess of the exempted amount in an election, shall file all applicable reports
required for the remainder of that election, based upon the amount of contributions or
expenditures the candidate or slate of candidates accepts or receives in that election.
(d) Any candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or August filing deadline and that intends
to execute a request for exemption shall file the appropriate request for exemption not later than the
deadline described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later
than sixty (60) days preceding the regular election. A candidate or slate of candidates that is covered by
this paragraph shall have the same reversion rights as those provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(e) Any candidate or slate of candidates that will appear on the ballot in a regular election that has signed a
request for exemption for that election may exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection if a candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or August
filing deadline subsequently files in opposition to the candidate or slate of candidates. Except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a candidate or slate of candidates

CHAPTER 175 43
covered by this paragraph shall comply with the deadline for rescission provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(f) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, any candidate or slate of
candidates that has filed a request for exemption for a regular election that later is opposed by a person
who has filed a declaration of intent to receive write-in votes may rescind the request for exemption and
exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(g) Any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption may petition the registry to
determine whether another person is campaigning as a write-in candidate prior to having filed a
declaration of intent to receive write-in votes, and, if the registry determines upon a preponderance of
the evidence that a person who may later be a write-in candidate is conducting a campaign, the
candidate or slate of candidates, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection, may petition the registry to permit the candidate or slate of candidates to exercise the
reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(h) If the opponent of a candidate or slate of candidates is replaced due to his or her withdrawal because of
death, disability, or disqualification, the candidate or slate of candidates, except as provided in
subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, may exercise the reversion rights provided in
subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection not later than fifteen (15) days after the party
executive committee nominates a replacement for the withdrawn candidate or slate of candidates.
(i) A person intending to be a write-in candidate for any office in a regular or special election may execute
a request for exemption under paragraph (a) of this subsection and shall be bound by its terms unless it
is rescinded in writing not later than fifteen (15) days preceding the regular or special election. A person
intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a request for exemption in a timely manner shall file
all reports required of a candidate intending to raise or spend in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000)
in an election. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person
intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a request for exemption shall file the appropriate form
with the registry.
(j) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, the campaign committee of
any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption or a political issues
committee whose chair has filed a request for exemption shall be bound by its terms unless it is
rescinded in a timely manner.
(k) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, any candidate, slate of
candidates, or political issues committee that is exempt from filing campaign finance reports
pursuant to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that accepts contributions or makes
expenditures, or whose campaign treasurer accepts contributions or makes expenditures, in
excess of the applicable limit in any one (1) election without rescinding the request for
exemption in a timely manner shall comply with all applicable reporting requirements and, in
lieu of other penalties prescribed by law, pay a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).
2. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, or political issues committee that is exempt from filing
campaign finance reports pursuant to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that knowingly
accepts contributions or makes expenditures in excess of the applicable spending limit in any one
(1) election without rescinding the request for exemption in a timely manner shall comply with
all applicable reporting requirements and shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(l) 1. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary shall file a report described
in subsection (4) of this section.
2. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary who advances to the
regular election shall file for an additional exemption under this section for the regular election
or the candidate shall no longer be exempt from the filing requirements.
3. In the event a candidate exempt from filing under this subsection is no longer eligible for the
exemption, he or she shall immediately file for a revocation of the exemption under paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

44 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) (a) State and county executive committees, and caucus campaign committees shall make a full report, upon
a prescribed form, to the registry, of all money, loans, or other things of value, received from any
source, and expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last report, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business
address of the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a
description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For other contributions in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)], the
full name, address, age if less than the legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount
of the contribution, and the employer and occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is
self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement of
expenditures shall include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made
in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
(b) In addition to the reporting requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the state executive
committee of a political party that has established a building fund account under KRS 121.172 shall
make a full report, upon a prescribed form, to the registry, of all contributions received from any source,
and expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last report for the separate building
fund account, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a corporation, the name and business address of
the corporation, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the
major business conducted by the corporation;
2. For other contributions in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)], the
full name and address of the contributor, the date of the contribution, the amount of the
contribution, and the employer and occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-
employed, the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement of
expenditures shall include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made
in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
(c) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made on a semiannual basis if the
committee has more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in its campaign fund account, and shall be
received by the registry by January 31 and by July 31. The January report shall cover the period from
July 1 to December 31. The July report shall cover the period from January 1 to June 30. If the
committee has less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in its campaign fund account the report required
by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made on an annual basis, and shall be received by the
registry by January 31. If an individual gives a reportable contribution to a caucus campaign committee
or to a state or county executive committee with the intention that the contribution or a portion of the
contribution go to a candidate or slate of candidates, the name of the contributor and the sum shall be
indicated on the committee report. The report required by paragraph (b) of this subsection relating to a
state executive committee's building fund account shall be received by the registry within seven (7)[two
(2)] business days after the close of each calendar quarter. The receipts and expenditures of funds
remitted to each political party under KRS 141.071 to 141.073 shall be separately accounted for and
reported to the registry in the manner required by KRS 121.230. The separate report may be made a
separate section within the report required by this subsection to be received by the registry by January
31.
(3) (a) Except for candidates or slates of candidates, campaign committees, or political issues committees
exempted from reporting requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, each campaign
treasurer of a candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or political issues committee who
accepts contributions or expends, expects to accept contributions or expend, or contracts to expend
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, and each fundraiser who secures
contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, shall make a full report

CHAPTER 175 45
to the registry, on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry, of all money, loans, or
other things of value, received from any source, and expenditures authorized, incurred, and made, since
the date of the last report, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business
address of the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a
description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For each contribution in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)] made
to any candidate or campaign committee or a political issues committee, the full name, address,
age if less than the legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount of the contribution,
and the employer and occupation of each other contributor. If the contributor is self-employed,
the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement
of expenditures shall include the name, address, and occupation of each person to whom an
expenditure is made in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of
each expenditure.
(b) Reports of all candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall be made as follows:
1. a. Candidates seeking statewide office, slates of candidates, campaign committees for
candidates seeking statewide office and for slates of candidates, independent expenditure-
only committees, political issues committees, and fundraisers which file the form
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section before the year of an election in which the
candidate, a slate of candidates, or public question shall appear on the ballot, shall file
financial reports with the registry at the end of the first calendar quarter after persons
become statewide candidates or slates of candidates, or following registration of the
committee or fundraiser, and each calendar quarter thereafter, ending with the last
calendar quarter of that year. The provisions of this subparagraph shall be retroactive to
January 1, 2021;
b. All other candidates and campaign committees shall file annual financial reports to be
received by the registry on or before December 1 for each year that a candidate is not yet
on the ballot but has filed a form as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section with the
registry for a future-year election; and
c. Candidates, slate of candidates, or committees shall make all reports required by
subparagraphs 2. to 5. of this paragraph during the year in which the election takes place;
2. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
sixtieth day preceding a regular election, including all previous contributions and expenditures;
3. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
thirtieth day preceding an election, including all previous contributions and expenditures;
4. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
fifteenth day preceding the date of the election; and
5. All reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during the entire reporting period and
must be received by the registry within seven (7)[two (2)] business days after the date the
reporting period ends to be deemed timely filed.
(4) All candidates, regardless of funds received or expended, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make post-election reports within
thirty (30) days after the election. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during
the entire reporting period and must be received by the registry within seven (7)[two (2)] business days after
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

46 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
the date the reporting period ends to be deemed timely filed. For candidates, slates of candidates, and political
issues committees otherwise exempt under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the reporting period begins the day
the request for exemption is filed with the registry and continues through the thirtieth day after the election.
(5) In making the preceding reports, the total gross receipts from each of the following categories shall be listed:
proceeds from the sale of tickets for events such as testimonial affairs, dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar
fundraising events, mass collections made at the events, and sales of items such as campaign pins, buttons,
hats, ties, literature, and similar materials. When any individual purchase or the aggregate purchases of any
item enumerated above from a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or a
campaign committee for a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office exceeds two
hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)], the purchaser shall be identified by name, address, age, if
less than the legal voting age, occupation, and employer or, if the purchaser is self-employed, the name under
which he or she is doing business, and the amount of the purchase. When any individual purchase or the
aggregate purchases of any item enumerated above from any candidate or campaign committee other than a
candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or campaign committee for a candidate or
slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office exceeds two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars
($100)], the purchaser shall be identified by name, address, age if less than the legal voting age, occupation,
and employer or, if the purchaser is self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing business, and the
amount of the purchase. The lists shall be maintained by the campaign treasurer, political issues committee
treasurer, registered fundraiser, or other sponsor for inspection by the registry for six (6) years following the
date of the election.
(6) Each permanent committee, except a federally registered political committee as defined in 52 U.S.C. sec.
30101(4)(a), inaugural committee, or contributing organization shall make a full report to the registry, on a
form provided or using a format approved by the registry, of all money, loans, or other things of value,
received by it from any source, and all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last
report, including:
(a) For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business address of
the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the
major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee;
(b) For other contributions in excess of two hundred dollars ($200)[one hundred dollars ($100)], the full
name, address, age if under the legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount of the
contribution, and the employer and occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-employed,
the name under which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
(c) An aggregate amount of cash contributions, the amount contributed by each contributor, and the date of
each contribution; and
(d) A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, including independent
expenditures. This report shall be made by a permanent committee, inaugural committee, or
contributing organization to the registry on the last day of the first calendar quarter following the
registration of the committee with the registry and on the last day of each succeeding calendar quarter
until such time as the committee terminates. A contributing organization shall file a report of
contributions received and expenditures on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry
not later than the last day of each calendar quarter in which contributions are received or expenditures
are made. All reports to the registry shall be received on or before each filing deadline, and any report
received by the registry within seven (7)[two (2)] business days after each filing deadline shall be
deemed timely filed.
(7) If the final statement of a candidate, campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee, or
political issues committee shows an unexpended balance of contributions, continuing debts and obligations, or
an expenditure deficit, the campaign treasurer shall file with the registry a supplemental statement of
contributions and expenditures not more than thirty (30) days after the deadline for filing the final statement.
Subsequent supplemental statements shall be filed annually, to be received by the registry by December 1 of
each year, until the account shows no unexpended balance, continuing debts and obligations, expenditures, or
deficit. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during the entire reporting period
and must be received by the registry within seven (7)[two (2)] business days after the date the reporting period
ends to be deemed timely filed. All contributions shall be subject to KRS 121.150 as of the date of the election
in which the candidate appeared on the ballot.

CHAPTER 175 47
(8) All reports filed under the provisions of this chapter shall be a matter of public record open to inspection by
any member of the public immediately upon receipt of the report by the registry.
(9) A candidate or slate of candidates is relieved of the duty personally to file reports and keep records of receipts
and expenditures if the candidate or slate states in writing or on forms provided by the registry that:
(a) Within five (5) business days after personally receiving any contributions, the candidate or slate of
candidates shall surrender possession of the contributions to the treasurer of their campaign committee
without expending any of the proceeds thereof. No contributions shall be commingled with the
candidate's or slated candidates' personal funds or accounts. Contributions received by check, money
order, or other written instrument shall be endorsed directly to the campaign committee and shall not be
cashed or redeemed by the candidate;
(b) The candidate or slate of candidates shall not make any unreimbursed expenditure for the campaign,
except that this paragraph does not preclude a candidate or slate from making an expenditure from
personal funds to the designated campaign committee, which shall be reported by the committee as a
contribution received; and
(c) The waiver shall continue in effect as long as the candidate or slate of candidates complies with the
conditions under which it was granted.
(10) (a) No candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee,
political issues committee, or contributing organization shall use or permit the use of contributions or
funds solicited or received for the person or in support of or opposition to a public issue which will
appear on the ballot to:
1. Further the candidacy of the person for a different public office, except that any member of the
General Assembly who has a remaining balance in his or her campaign account may elect to
transfer those funds to a campaign account to seek election to statewide constitutional office;
2. Support or oppose a different public issue; or
3. Further the candidacy of any other person for public office.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a candidate or slate of candidates from using
funds in a campaign account to contribute directly to another candidate or slate of candidates for state or
federal office, or to purchase admission tickets for any fundraising event or testimonial affair for
another candidate or slate of candidates for state or federal office, if the amount of the purchase or
contribution does not exceed the individual contribution limit contained in KRS 121.150(6) or 52
U.S.C. sec. 30116 in any one (1) election.
(c) Any funds or contributions solicited or received by or on behalf of a candidate, slate of candidates, or
any committee, which has been organized in whole or in part to further any candidacy for the same
person or to support or oppose the same public issue, shall be deemed to have been solicited or received
for the current candidacy or for the election on the public issue if the funds or contributions are solicited
or received at any time prior to the regular election for which the candidate, slate of candidates, or
public issue is on the ballot.
(d) Any unexpended balance of funds not otherwise obligated for the payment of expenses incurred to
further a political issue or the candidacy of a person shall, in whole or in part, at the election of the
candidate or committee:
1. Escheat to the State Treasury;
2. Be returned pro rata to all contributors;
3. In the case of a partisan candidate, be transferred to:
a. A caucus campaign committee; or
b. The state or county executive committee of the political party of which the candidate is a
member;
4. Be retained to further the same public issue or to seek election to the same office, except that any
member of the General Assembly who has a remaining balance in his or her campaign
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

48 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
account may elect to transfer those funds to a campaign account to seek election to statewide
constitutional office; or
5. Be donated to any charitable, nonprofit, or educational institution recognized under Section
501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any successor
thereto, from which the candidate or committee receives no financial benefit.
(11) If adequate and appropriate agency funds are available to implement this subsection, electronic reporting shall
be made available by the registry to all candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing
organizations, registered fundraisers, and persons making independent expenditures. The electronic report
submitted to the registry shall be the official campaign finance report for audit and other legal purposes,
whether mandated or filed by choice.
(12) The date that an electronic or online[on-line] report shall be deemed to have been filed with the registry shall
be the date on which it is received by the registry.
(13) All electronic or online filers shall affirm, under penalty of perjury, that the report filed with the registry is
complete and accurate.
(14) Filers who submit electronic campaign finance reports which are not readable, or cannot be copied shall be
deemed to not be in compliance with the requirements set forth in this section.
(15) Beginning with the primary scheduled in calendar year 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled
thereafter, reports required to be submitted to the registry involving candidates, slates of candidates,
committees, contributing organizations, and independent expenditures shall be reported electronically.
(16) (a) On each form that the registry supplies for the reports required under subsections (2), (3), and (6) of this
section, the registry shall include an entry reading, "No change since last report."
(b) If a person or entity that is required to report under subsection (2), (3), or (6) of this section has received
no money, loans, or other things of value from any source since the date of its last report and has not
authorized, incurred, or made any expenditures since that date, the person or entity may check or
otherwise designate the entry that reads, "No change since last report." A person or entity designating
this entry in a report shall state the balance carried forward from the last report but need not specify
receipts or expenditures in further detail.
Section 46. KRS 121.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All newspaper or magazine advertising, posters, circulars, billboards, handbills, sample ballots, digital media,
and paid-for television or radio announcements, or any other type of general public political advertising, which
expressly advocate the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, slate of candidates, or group of
candidates for nomination or election to any public office, or expressly advocate or oppose a ballot measure,
shall be identified by the words "paid for by" followed by the name and address of the individual or committee
which paid for the communication; except that if paid for by a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign
committee, it shall be identified only by the words "paid for by" followed by the name of the candidate, slate
of candidates, or campaign committee, whichever is applicable. For television and radio broadcasts,
compliance with Federal Communications Commission regulations regarding sponsored programs and
broadcasts by candidates for public office shall be considered compliance with this section.
(2) The disclaimer described in subsection (1) of this section shall appear and be presented in a clear and
conspicuous manner to give the reader or observer adequate notice of the identity of the purchaser of the
communication. A disclaimer does not comply with this section if the disclaimer is difficult to read or if the
placement of the disclaimer is easily overlooked.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion, or commentary writings, or letter to the editor
printed in a newspaper, magazine, flyer, pamphlet, or other periodical not owned or controlled by a
candidate or committee;
(b) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility not owned or controlled by a
candidate or committee;
(c) Any communication by a person made in the regular course and scope of the person's business or any
communication made by a membership organization solely to members of the organization and the
members' families; and

CHAPTER 175 49
(d) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the popular name of a bill or statute.
(4) (a) A person shall not use, cause or permit to be used, or continue to use any published, distributed, or
broadcast political advertising containing express advocacy that the person knows does not include the
disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section. A person is presumed to know that the use of
political advertising is prohibited by this subsection if the registry notifies the person in writing that the
use is prohibited.
(b) A person who learns that political advertising signs that have been distributed do not include the
disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section or include a disclosure that does not comply with
subsection (1) of this section does not commit a violation of this subsection if the person makes a good-
faith attempt to remove or correct those signs within forty-eight (48) hours and provides the registry
with proof of correction.
(5) The management of newspapers and magazines shall keep a one (1) year record of all statements, articles, or
advertisements referred to in subsection (1) of this section, that appear in their publications, however, nothing
in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to require editors or editorial writers of newspapers and
magazines to identify themselves in the manner therein required with any article or editorial written by them as
part of their duties as an employee or employer.
Section 47. KRS 121.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each candidate, slate of candidates, and each committee shall, before receiving any contributions or expending
any money, designate one (1) primary campaign depository for the purpose of depositing all contributions
received and disbursing all expenditures made by the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee. The
candidate, slate of candidates, or committee may also designate one (1) secondary depository in each county in
which an election is held and in which the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee participates. Deputy
campaign treasurers may make expenditures from secondary depositories but only from moneys which first
have been deposited in the primary campaign depository. Only a financial institution authorized to transact
business in Kentucky may be designated as a campaign depository. The candidate, slate of candidates, or
committee shall file the name and address of each primary and secondary depository so designated at the same
time the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee files the name of his, her, or its campaign treasurer.
(2) All funds received by the campaign treasurer or any deputy campaign treasurer of any candidate, slate of
candidates, or committee shall be deposited in a campaign depository in an account designated "Campaign
Fund of (name of candidate or committee)." For each deposit, the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign
treasurer shall retain a statement showing the name and business address of the permanent committee, the
amount contributed, and a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the
permanent committee for each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, and the full name,
address, employer of each other contributor or, if the contributor is self-employed, the name under which he or
she is doing business, and occupation of each contributor of more than two hundred dollars ($200)[one
hundred dollars ($100)] and the amount contributed. Cash contributions shall be accompanied by the same
receipt form.
Section 48. KRS 117.228 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, ]On the day of a primary, an election, or during in-person
absentee voting, if a voter is unable to provide proof of identification as required under KRS 117.225, and as
defined under KRS 117.001, a voter may cast a ballot if the individual:
(a) Is eligible to vote under KRS 116.025;
(b) Is entitled to vote in that precinct; and
(c) In the presence of the election officer, executes a voter's affirmation, on a form prescribed and furnished
by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter
13A, affirming:
1. The voter is a citizen of the United States;
2. The voter's date of birth to the best of the voter's knowledge and belief;
3. The voter is qualified to vote in this precinct under KRS 116.025;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

50 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. The voter's name, and that the voter is generally known by that name, or the name is as stated on
his or her voter registration card;
5. The voter has not voted and will not vote in any other precinct;
6. The voter's current residential address, including the street address number and, if different from
the voter's current address, the voter's residential address prior to the close of the registration
books under KRS 116.045, and the date the voter moved;
7. The voter understands that making a false statement on the affirmation is punishable under
penalties of perjury; and
8. The voter has one (1) of the following impediments to procure proof of identification as defined
in KRS 117.001:
a. Lack of transportation;
b. Inability to obtain his or her birth certificate or other documents needed to show proof of
identification;
c. Work schedule;
d. Lost or stolen identification;
e. Disability or illness;
f. Family responsibilities;
g. The proof of identification has been applied for, but not yet received; or
h. The voter has a religious objection to being photographed.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, to cast a ballot, the voter who is unable to
provide proof of identification shall provide to an election officer:
(a) [The voter's Social Security card;
(b) ]Any identification card issued by a county in this state which has the name of the voter stated and has
been approved in writing by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations
promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A; or
(b)[(c)] Any identification card with the voter's photograph and the name of the voter stated[; or
(d) Any food stamp identification card, electronic benefit transfer card, or supplemental nutrition assistance
card, that is issued by this state and has the name of the voter stated].
(3) After the election officer obtains the affirmation from the voter required by subsection (1) of this section, and
after the voter provides the documents under subsection (2) of this section, the voter shall sign the precinct
signature roster and shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot completion area.
(4) [If the voter is personally known to the election officer, the election officer may execute an election officer
affirmation, on a form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative
regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, affirming the voter's identification as being personally
known to him or her. Once the affirmation is executed by the election officer, the voter shall sign the precinct
signature roster and shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot completion area. For purposes of this
subsection, "personally known" means that the election officer knows the voter's name and that the voter is a
resident of the community.
(5) ]The voter affirmation[ and the election officer affirmations] executed under this section shall be processed in
the same manner as an oath of voter affidavit as prescribed by KRS 117.245(3) and (4).
Section 49. KRS 116.114 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Secretary of State, in cooperation with the State Board of Elections, shall issue and present a
comprehensive activity report regarding voter registration records cleanup activities on or before July 1 of
each year to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint[appropriate] Committee on
State Government. The Secretary of State and the State Board of Elections shall also make the report available
to the public on their respective official websites. The activity report shall include:

CHAPTER 175 51
(a) Any activities to resolve reported anomalies per address, such as a high number of people living at a
single-family home address, voters registered at a commercial location, or voters registered at an
address that is a vacant lot;
(b) Any activities to resolve incidents of multiple people registered at the same address with the same age
that have minor variations in the spelling of the name and the status of the resolution of those
duplicates;
(c) The number of voter eligibility changes, which shall include relocation out of state, death, incarceration,
expungement, and citizenship status changes; and
(d) Any use of a national voter registration clearinghouse system or interstate agreement to remove
inaccurate or fraudulent registrations and the cost of those agreements. No agreement or contract shall
be entered into after April 1, 2025, that obligates the state to make any expenditures or efforts to
register unregistered persons, but agreements for the[ sole] purpose of exchanging data to remove
ineligible voters are expressly permitted.
(2) (a) The State Board of Elections shall create a data-based report on or before July 1 of each year,
containing every address in each county that lists a registered voter and the number of active and
inactive voters registered at that address. Any personal identifying information shall be redacted, and
any persons residing at those addresses shall not be contacted about their registration except by mail.
(b) Citizens of each county shall have in-person access to the report at the county clerk's office, as well as
online access via the Secretary of State's and State Board of Elections' official websites. Any
discrepancies may be reported via the publicly available link on the Secretary of State's and State Board
of Elections' official websites.
(c) The Secretary of State and State Board of Elections shall provide a publicly available link on their
respective official websites for citizens to report anomalies or discrepancies, and also a secure
electronic form to allow a voter currently on the registered voter rolls erroneously to voluntarily cancel
his or her voter registration in Kentucky.
Section 50. The following KRS section is repealed:
118.551 Definition of political party.
Section 51. Section 30 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2028.
Section 52. Whereas it is critically important to protect the integrity and reliability of the electoral process
in order to safeguard the fundamental right to vote, and it is a reasonable legislative task to seek improvement and
modernization of campaign finance and election procedures without undue delay in notice to the people of the
Commonwealth and its election officials tasked with administering the election laws within this state, an emergency
is declared to exist, and Sections 1 to 27, 32, 33, 49, and 50 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version